Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
Number of Reviews
27

Author
Mac VerStandig
---Those of you in the Portland, Maine area can hear Mac VerStandig's 
film reviews every Friday morning on the 98.9 The Point morning show.---
A copy of this review can be found at 
http://www.moviereviews.org/the_hurricane.htm
First he wrote a book about it. Then Bob Dylan wrote a critically 
acclaimed song about it. Now Academy Award winning director Norman 
Jewison and Academy Award winning actor Denzel Washington have a made a 
movie about it. The man is Rubin "Hurricane" Carter and the story is one 
of such power that it puts the knock-out punches he delivered as a prize 
fighter to shame.
"Here comes the story of the hurricane." (Did you really think I would 
make it through this review without quoting Bob Dylan?) Rubin Carter 
(Denzel Washington) was the champion of the world, having lost but a 
handful of fights and delivering forceful flurries of punches that would 
floor his opponents. But he was also black, something that didn't 
stand well in the eyes of a certain police officer (Dan Hedaya). When 
two black men wreak murderous havoc on a bar one night in the 1960's, 
Hurricane and another man soon find themselves in prison for a crime 
they didn't commit. The film ventures away from the other man and 
focuses on Hurricane; his way of coping with prison ("innocence is 
highly overrated commodity"); his refusal to give in ("I've committed 
no crime. A crime has been committed against me") and his eventually 
giving up ("I'm dead. Just bury me please"). Then, when hope was all 
but lost, a young and once underprivileged black boy, being raised and 
schooled by an upper-middle class Canadian family, stumbled upon the 
aforementioned autobiography. With the help of his new Canadian family, 
Lesra Martin (Vicellous Reon Shannon) looks to free the champion of the 
world in the biggest fight Hurricane will ever step into .
The Hurricane spends little time on Rubin Carter's childhood and 
instead focuses intensely on the very interesting time he spent in the 
boxing ring, in prison and in court. Boxing brings enjoyable sporting 
moments, while prison offers deep intellectual insights and court 
provides (SPOLER!!!) a heartbreak early-on and a sure-to-make-you-smile 
moment at the film's end.
Most of the film is spent in prison, however. Recently, The Green Mile 
painted a particularly rosy and black and white view of jail with 
extraordinarily kind guards and inmates minus the few rotten apples who 
are 100% rotten. Here things are more complex: some guards are nice, 
some are cruel and one particularly kind inmate professes wicked ways. 
But Hurricane isolates himself from the beginning when he gets 90 days 
in the hole for refusing to wear prison-issued garments.
Denzel Washington gives yet another kick-ass performance in a year when 
many great acting jobs will unfortunately lack recognition due to high 
quantity. The supporting cast also comes up strong with Dan Hedaya as a 
bigoted police officer and youngster Vicellous Reon Shannon as a 
curiosity driven, justice seeking boy in the champ's corner.
Simply put, The Hurricane is a knock-out punch.

Author
Shannon Patrick Sullivan
Directed by Norman Jewison. Screenplay by Armyan Bernstein and Dan 
Gordon, based on the books "The Sixteenth Round" by Rubin Carter and 
"Lazarus and the Hurricane" by Sam Chaiton and Terry Swinton. Starring 
Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Dan Hedaya. Running time: 146 
minutes. Rated AA for controversial subject matter and offensive language.
Reviewed on February 23rd, 2000.
"The Hurricane" is the story of boxer Rubin Carter (Denzel Washington), a 
middleweight boxing champion who in 1966 was convicted of three murders, 
on the basis of a case steeped in racial prejudice. During Carter's stay 
in prison, his plight drew the attention of "the famous and the 
infamous", including celebrities such as Bob Dylan and Muhammed Ali. Despite 
this, Carter remained imprisoned until 1985, when a teenager named Lesra 
Martin (Vicellous Reon Shannon) -- inspired by Carter's autobiography 
"The Sixteenth Round" -- took up his cause.
"The Hurricane" has many things going for it. In particular, there is 
Washington's performance as Hurricane Carter, which has won him a Golden 
Globe award and an Emmy nomination. Washington practically disappears into 
the character, suffusing Carter with nobility, passion and determination.
This is not an easy role to play: Washington's challenge is to portray 
Carter as intense without turning him into a fanatic. He succeeds, with a 
performance broad enough to permit Carter not just great strength but 
also moments of weakness, especially as Lesra's efforts start to bear 
fruit. "I'm fifty years old," Carter laments to his lawyers at one point. 
He has been in prison more than half his life, and we feel the 
weight of every one of those years.
The defining moment of Washington's performance comes when, at the start of 
his life sentence, Carter refuses to wear a prison uniform because he 
will not wear the clothes of a guilty man. He is sent into solitary 
confinement for ninety days to reconsider his protest. In many ways, he 
never emerges: to cope with his imprisonment, Carter isolates himself 
from the rest of the world. He focuses on honing his mind and body, and 
congregates more with his own inner demons than with his fellow inmates. 
The scenes of Carter in jail are "The Hurricane's" most powerful, but in 
a sense are really just a backdrop for one of the movie's main themes, 
about redemption through the written word. This is made clear from the 
start: an early scene sees an uncharacteristically desperate Carter 
pleading with a friendly prison guard (Clancy Brown) that his cell not be 
searched, for fear of having his partly-completed autobiography taken. It 
is by writing his story, and by reading voraciously, that Carter survives 
the prison experience. "The Sixteenth Round" becomes the first book the 
barely-literate Lesra ever buys, and through it he discovers Hurricane 
Carter's plight. Carter and Lesra spend much of the movie communicating 
not by phone but by letters. And by the end, this odyssey of paper and 
ink has benefited both their lives.
Performances from the rest of the cast are respectable but not as 
well-rounded. This is not entirely surprising; "The Hurricane" is 
Carter's story, after all, and he deserves the spotlight. But the lack 
of development of the supporting cast is disappointing, particularly in 
the case of Lesra, a young man from a broken home whose encounters with 
Carter help him realize his own potential. Shannon's acting is capable, 
but the growth of his character is conveyed more by what we are told than 
what we are shown, transgressing a fundamental rule of storytelling.
Given rather less to do are Lesra's guardians (Deborah Unger, Liev 
Schreiber, John Hannah). They act virtually as a gestalt, often referred 
to simply (and irritatingly) as "the Canadians". We never really get a 
firm idea of why they do what they do -- why they are together, why they 
are taking care of Lesra, why they do so much to help Carter (even moving 
to New Jersey from Ontario!) -- and it seems little effort was expended 
in making them anything more than plot facilitators.
I was nine years old when Rubin Carter was released from prison and have 
no recollection of the events surrounding his eventual freedom, so I can 
offer little comment as to the historical accuracy of "The Hurricane". 
Indeed, I don't think a film need be bound by the letter of the truth, if 
a certain amount of license will make it better artistically. But I have 
to wonder if the wholesale invention of Detective Della Pesca (Dan 
Hedaya) does "The Hurricane" service from either a factual or an 
aesthetic point of view.
In the movie, Della Pesca is the man mainly responsible for setting up 
Hurricane Carter, a deed which is the culmination of a lifelong grudge 
against the boxer. In reality, he never existed. He is intended, I suppose,
to be a synthesis of all those who helped put Carter away, but Della 
Pesca himself is so crucial to "The Hurricane" that it is difficult to 
imagine how things 'really' happened. Moreover, he is almost 
embarrassingly one-dimensional, given no more characterization beyond 
his vaguely-motivated hatred for Carter. It almost feels as though Della 
Pesca should have worn a black hat and a Snidely Whiplash-style moustache.
Indeed, the movie's biggest problem is that the story itself ends up 
feeling excessively Hollywood-ized. Nowhere is this more true than in the 
climactic courtroom scenes, which -- true to reality or not -- feel like 
a disappointing cop-out after two hours of Washington's enthralling 
characterization. There were many issues "The Hurricane" could have dealt 
with more fully: the maturation of Lesra, the way an entire justice 
system can be blinded by prejudice, even the question of whether Carter 
really might have committed the crimes (the movie doesn't even raise the 
possibility). Instead of challenging us, the film settles for a routine 
trial scene surprisingly lacking in dramatic value, as if director Norman 
Jewison knew the ending was uninspired.
We already know how the movie is going to end, so emphasizing the court
proceedings is unnecessary. It is a shame that so gripping a performance 
as Washington's winds up being subordinate to a cliche. "The Hurricane" 
would have been better served by keeping its focus on the characters and 
their personal journeys, instead of the events through which they traveled.
Copyright Š 2000 Shannon Patrick Sullivan.
Archived at http://www.physics.mun.ca/~sps/movies/TheHurricane.html

Author
Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on April 7, 2000; certificate 
15; 145 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Norman Jewison; produced by Armyan Bernstein, Norman Jewison, 
John Ketcham.
Written by Armyan Bernstein, Dan Gordon; based on the books "The 16th Round" 
by Rubin 'Hurricane' Carter and "Lazarus and the Hurricane" by Sam Chaiton, 
Terry Swinton.
Photographed by Roger Deakins; edited by Stephen Rivkin.
We all have talents that mystify other people -- some folks can work complex 
equations in their heads, others can run for miles without getting short of 
breath, and we all know some show-off who can cartwheel like there's no 
tomorrow. I can't do any of that stuff, but I do know Bob Dylan's 
eight-minute ballad "Hurricane" off by heart. Impressive, eh?
The song is the first track on Dylan's 1975 album "Desire", and tells the 
story of Rubin 'Hurricane' Carter, a black middleweight boxer from New Jersey 
who angered intolerant locals with his cocky handling of success. In 1966, 
when the authorities saw a chance to frame him for murder, they jumped at it. 
"How can the life of such a man be in the palm of some fool's hand?" Dylan 
asked, and for quite some time Ellen Burstyn, Muhammad Ali and a whole host 
of other celebrities and activists were equally concerned.
Despite his status as a cause célčbre, though, it took twenty years for 
Carter and his co-defendant to be released from prison. When they were, 
according to Norman Jewison's film "The Hurricane", it was largely due to the 
efforts of a commune of Canadians and a young boy they were schooling. The 
kid, Lesra Martin (Viscellous Reon Shannon), had bought Carter's 
autobiography for twenty-five cents at a used book sale. This event changed 
the course of both his life and that of the fighter.
Carter (Denzel Washington), as Lesra discovers from his reading and we learn 
in the film, had an upbringing heavily influenced by racial persecution, and 
vowed to make weapons out of his body and mind. In prison, his shell grows 
harder, and he becomes a vessel of mistrust and hate. "There's no more Rubin 
Carter," he says in his book. To his wife: "I'm dead. Move on. Bury me."
Somehow Lesra is able to strike up a correspondence with him; he DOES feel 
alive when he's writing, because he doesn't have to look at the dehumanising 
prison walls. The communication develops into friendship and love, and 
results in the boy and his surrogate family dedicating their lives to 
Carter's appeal. One of the most involving things about "The Hurricane" is 
how it demonstrates the power of the written word -- showing that it can free 
souls, stimulate emotions and overcome violence and evil. Another is its 
portrayal of how Rubin, who had so thoroughly trained himself to use hatred 
as a means of survival, earned liberation by having the courage to feel love 
and trust.
This is fantastic material -- the kind of thing we're talking about when we 
refer to "triumphs of the human spirit". It's regrettable that Jewison has 
not presented it with more panache. Gone is the powerful staccato rhythm of 
Dylan, and instead we get such ludicrous dialogue as "You're going down, 
punk!" and "Jeez... you're having a smoke for breakfast?" There are tears, 
speeches behind bars and far too much sentimental scoring. Dan Hedaya gives a 
ludicrous performance as a corrupt cop who lurks in corners grimacing and 
growling.
The movie is made with such lack of edge that at times it runs the risk of 
alienating us, like a made-for-TV weepie. But the story somehow survives, and 
remains potent, and that is a testament to how great a tale it is. Just as 
'Hurricane' himself championed over oppressive forces, so too does his legend 
transcend a sloppy telling, and remain one worth knowing.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Author
Rose 'Bams' Cooper
The Hurricane (1999) 
Rated R; running time 146 minutes
Genre: Drama
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0174856 
Official site: http://www.universalpictures.com/hurricane/  
Written by: Written by Armyan Bernstein (based on the book by 
 Rubin 'Hurricane' Carter)
Directed by: Norman Jewison
Starring:Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Dan Hedaya, 
Deborah Unger, Liev Schreiber, John Hannah, Debbi Morgan, David Paymer, 
Harris Yulin, Clancy Brown, Rod Steiger, Garland Whitt
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamshurricane.html
If you've either never heard the true story of Rubin "The Hurricane" 
Carter and how he was imprisoned for more than 20 years for crimes he 
didn't commit, or you can't infer whether he was released or not from 
the tone of the trailers that have been shown, you might not want to 
read this review, since I'll be pulling no punches in telling what 
happened at the end.  After all, I respect my readers' intelligence.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
A strong contender for the middleweight boxing title during the 60s, 
Rubin "The Hurricane" Carter's (Denzel Washington) hopes were dashed 
when he and John Artis (Garland Whitt) were sentenced to three life 
terms and imprisoned for 20 years for murders he didn't commit.  This is 
his story...
...and it is also the story of an unlikely group of folks from Canada 
(one, by way of Brooklyn): Lesra Martin (Vicellous Reon Shannon), a 
young Black teen from Brooklyn, being homeschooled in Toronto by three 
White Canadians, Lisa Peters (Deborah Unger), Sam Chaiton (Liev 
Schreiber), and Terry Swinton (John Hannah).  By a strange twist of 
fate, Lesra finds a book written by Rubin about his unjust imprisonment, 
and he is so moved by it and his feverent belief in Rubin's innocence, 
that he convinces the Canadians to help him set Rubin free.  But not 
without a fight; they come up against pure evil, in the form of Det. 
Vincent Della Pesca (Dan Hedaya), a dirty, racist cop who's been after 
Carter for years, and does all he can to see that Rubin remains locked 
up.
The Upshot (WARNING: **more spoilers contained below**)
Let me get this out of the way: Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon 
Shannon, and Dan Hedaya were outstanding in this film.  Washington, 
we've seen go "all-out" before, so his strong performance didn't 
surprise me at all.  Hedaya is one of those character actors that you 
know you've seen a million time, but can't put your finger on where, 
exactly; he's played Funny ("Cheers") as well as straight drama 
("Nixon"), but never before has he sent chills down my spine as he did 
here.  But Shannon really impressed me in the strangest of ways: every 
time he spoke, I said to myself, "his voice and his body don't match".  
For some reason, I kept expecting to hear a "softer" voice, but sure 
enough, his heavy Brooklyn accent came through each time.  But beyond 
that, Shannon's portrayal of Lesra's passionate belief in Rubin, and in 
his place in Rubin's life, astonished me--and will hopefully move him 
beyond the Obligatory Thug Roles that the IMDB lists him as having 
played so frequently in the past (if there's any justice in Hollywood.  
Notice that I'm not holding my breath).
The story itself, though moving, felt somewhat hollow.  Though of course 
Rubin couldn't know what became of John Artis while they were both in 
prison, I felt short-changed by the offhand mention of him throughout 
the film, and especially at the end.  I also got somewhat dizzy during 
the flashback/flashforward sequences; though the boxing scenes were 
beautifully shot in black and white, they felt cut-n-pasted on, and I 
could never fully understand their true significance to the story being 
told.  And one has to wonder how, after Rubin's lawyers Myron Beldoc 
(David Paymer) and Harris Yulin (Leon Friedman) spent ten years on a 
case that was heard by two juries, the Canadians could come along 
and...well, see for yourself.  Something else bothered me, involving 
Rubin's wife, Mae Thelma (Debbie Morgan) and the scene from the trailers 
which show Rubin telling her to "bury him".  Unfortunately, saying 
exactly what bothered me, would call for more spoilage than I'm prepared 
to do, so I'll have to wait to discuss this with the curious reader 
after they've has seen the movie.  Still, in spite of its padding (a 
half-hour could've easily been excised from this movie, with little 
detriment), "The Hurricane" spins a good tale; fractured, in places, but 
still told reasonably well.
Besides the performances of the three leads mentioned above, most of the 
other cast seemed pretty mute.  Liev Schreiber was almost invisible in a 
role that one would think would provide ample opportunity for him to 
shine in--especially since his character's (Sam Chaiton) book is given a 
writing credit in the film.  Unger and Hannah were almost as marginal; 
until their stint at private eye-ism, they could just as well have been 
shown as Lesra's babysitters, to no real detriment to the story.  And 
what a wasted opportunity the movie's Powers That Be made in not using 
Clancy Brown to his fullest potential; he's played prison guards enough 
before that casting him as Jimmy Williams, the Guard With A Heart (But 
Not Much To Do), made little sense to me.  But still, not as little 
sense as the casting of Rod Steiger as Judge H. Lee Sorokin.  Maybe I'm 
the only one who saw "Crazy In Alabama", and therefore, saw Steiger's 
Judge there.  Played as an absolute loon in that film, Steiger worked; 
here, he was just more flotsam.  But maybe I'm too picky.
The use of period music throughout the film was excellent, even Bob 
"damn, I can't sing!" Dylan's song, "Hurricane", written during the time 
when Dylan was one of a few celebrities (along with Ellen Burstyn and 
Muhammad Ali) who were trying to get Rubin set free early on in his 
sentence.  Their involvement (or lack thereof) over time was a key point 
made by Beldoc, when Lesra and the Canadians came to confront him in 
what Beldoc surely saw as Guilty White Liberalism at its worst.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Actually, since the BF is pretty clear in this flick, consider this 
space The "White Factor".  And let's go one step further: since Della 
Pesca's (and those like him) rabid racism need no explanation, let's 
examine the "Guilty White Liberal Factor", shall we?
Guilty White Liberals make an easy target; they seem to come in like a 
whirlwind, upset the status quo, do what they see as The Right Thing for 
those poor heathens who they deem worthy of their patronage, and leave 
after their Guilt is assuaged, right?  Well, maybe.  And maybe the three 
Guilty White Liberals from Canada took pity on both Rubin and Lesra, and 
by helping them, they purged themselves of their Guilt long enough to 
look back at their lives and feel they've Done Good--much to the 
consternation of those other poor heathens left behind in their wake who 
weren't so lucky as to gain the favor of those Guilty White Liberals.  
Maybe that's the way some see it. 
To those "some", ask yourself this: is Rubin still in that prison?
And as for the fellow (self-identified as being White) who, after he 
read Diva's "The Hurricane" review, took it upon himself to scold 3BC, 
saying we should be ashamed for not slamming "The Hurricane" for 
deifying those Guilty White Liberals?  Pardon my French, but he can 
baise mon bel noir ane.
Bammer's Bottom Line 
Overall, a powerful story that feels padded in spots (especially those 
involving the Danger! the Canadians were in, and how they so "easily" 
did what others couldn't do over the period of 15 or so years.  Yeah, 
right.), featuring bravura performances by Washington, Shannon, and 
Hedaya that should not be missed, but will likely be ignored come Oscar 
night.

Author
Akiva Gottlieb
THE HURRICANE (Universal Pictures)- Norman (`Moonstruck')
Jewison's latest film is a biopic of former boxer Ruben
`Hurricane' Carter, who, in the mid-60's, was framed for the
murder of three white men and sentenced to life in prison.
Carter's story (which Bob Dylan immortalized in his song,
`Hurricane') is an important one, and it involves the topic of
racial injustice, which Norman Jewison depicted to perfection in films
such as `In The Heat Of The Night', `A Soldier's Story'
and even `Fiddler On The Roof' .  But in order to truly express
my disappointment at `The Hurricane', I must quote fellow critic
Roger Ebert.  `Movies aren't about what they're about,' he
says.  `They're about how they're about what they're
about.' Jewison has the story (and the 2 1/2 hour running time) for
an epic, but the script (by Armyan Bernstein and Dan Gordon) and
direction are wildly unfocused, making this `Hurricane' a
near-disaster.
        Luckily, Denzel Washington plays Ruben Carter, and his
performance is riveting throughout.  Carter's jail scenes are more
than watchable, but they do not make up the core of the film.
Instead, `The Hurricane' is about Lesra Martin (Vicellous Reon
Shannon), a teenager who is so moved by Carter's biography that he
starts to visit the convict and attempt to free him.  But their
friendship is portrayed in such melodramatic fashion that all feeling
is lost, and we end up with a dull movie about a boy trying to solve a
murder-mystery.  Jewison adds a thick layer of cheese on what could
have been an intense emotional experience.  Not exactly what I
expected from the last film to be released this millennium.
        Supposedly, Universal Pictures is expecting to garner some
Oscars for this `inspirational true story', but Denzel
Washington's intense portrayal is the only reason to see this
otherwise atrocious excuse for a film.  But what do I know?  `The
Hurricane' was praised at this year's Cannes Film Festival,
where it received a standing ovation.  There is a good film somewhere
at the core of this mess, and with some major editing, maybe the
viewers will be able to see it.  Norman Jewison may be an experienced
filmmaker, but to me, real experience is knowing that films are about
more than they're about.(opens December 29 in limited release)


Author
JABII
Directed by: Norman Jewison
Written by: Rubin "Hurricane" Carter, Sam Chaiton
In the past I have stated that strong performances are incapable of saving an
otherwise weak film (1998's Hurlyburly being a perfect example of this). Denzel
Washington proves me wrong in "The Hurricane", the story of Rubin "Hurricane"
Carter. While the film itself is languid, overlong, and melodramatic,
Washington's performance is outstanding. Washington has, in fact, already
received a Golden Globe nomination for his role, and if he doesn't receive an
Oscar nomination to go along with this, someone in the academy is going to
hang.
Shot in two different time periods, the film tells the story of Rubin
"Hurricane" Carter (Denzel Washington). Portions of the film show Rubin's rise
to fame and troubles with the authorities. The time frame then shifts to
Rubin's days in prison and the efforts of a young man named Lesra (Vicellous
Reon Shannon) and his three Canadian teachers/foster parents (John Hannah, Liev
Schreiber, Deborah Unger) to free him. While the group searches for clues which
will help exonerate Carter, they are threatened and harassed by the racist cop
(Dan Hedaya) who pinned the murder on Rubin thirty years prior.
The majority of the film moves along at such a leisurely pace that I noticed
half of the audience drifting off. During these scenes, all one can do is wait
for Washington to show up and ignite the screen. However, not all of the film
is quite so sluggish. The scenes in which the Canadians hunt for clues move
along at a nice, brisk pace. The biggest fault perhaps lies in the amount of
time spent on Carter's younger days. For nearly half of the very long picture,
we watch Carter get cheated out of everything he's earned again and again.
During these scenes, we're shown Hedaya's vengeful Lieutenant Della Pesce
trying everything he can to have Carter locked up. The problem here is that
despite a great job by Hedaya (as always), the character has no personality.
He's evil, pure and simple. We're given nothing beyond this. In a movie like
"Star Wars" this works fine, but here we really need something more to make us
hate this character.
As for the performances here, I've already made clear how incredible Washington
is, but the majority of the supporting cast is really quite good as well. I
truly believe that Dan Hedaya can't help but act well. Liev Schrieber (Scream
2), Deborah Unger (The Game), and John Hannah (The Mummy) are all adequate at
their worst and entertaining at their best. Clancy Brown (Highlander) and Rod
Steiger (End of Days) both make fairly brief appearances, but both are talented
enough actors that it's a pleasure seeing them at all. The only weak link here
is Vicellous Reon Shannon. I'm not entirely sure if this is due to Shannon
himself, or the rather weak dialogue written for him. I lean towards the latter
because every now and then Shannon seems to break free and display some real
talent. 
"The Hurricane" is by no means a great movie. It can, however, be an
interesting one at times. The film runs 125 minutes, which would normally be a
good running time, but fifteen minutes or so of this movie could easily have
been chopped. "The Hurricane" is at its best when we see how Carter deals with
life in prison, which involves him cutting himself off from anything and anyone
he cared about. However, countless melodramatic scenes and a whole lot of
preaching keep the film from being anything more than fairly good. I'd
recommend waiting for video on this one, but do try and see it. 
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Author
Donlee Brussel
Cast: Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Liev Schreiber,
Deborah Unger, John Hannah, Dan Hedaya, David Paymer, Rod Steiger
Director: Norman Jewison
Screenplay: Armyan Bernstein and Dan Gordon, based on "Lazarus and The
Hurricane" by Sam Chaiton and Terry Swinton, and "The 16th Round" by
Rubin 'Hurricane' Carter
150 minutes
Rated R
In this corner, the master of playing the Negro oppressed by the white
man, the two-time Oscar nominee (Cry Freedom & Malcolm X) and once
Oscar winner (Glory), the thespian, the one and only Denzel
Washington!  And in the other corner, the master craftsman of the
clichéd & manipulative (Bogus), the thrice Oscar nominated (In The Heat
of the Night, Fiddler on the Roof & Moonstruck) and Irving G. Thalberg
Memorial Award recipient, the man with the plan, Norman Jewison!
Together for the first time since "A Soldier's Story," in a film based
on "Lazarus and The Hurricane" by Sam Chaiton and Terry Swinton, and
on "The 16th Round" by Rubin 'Hurricane' Carter.  Ladies and
gentleman, "The Hurricane!"
The film opens on December 20, 1963 with an awesome black and white
boxing match (shot elaborately by Roger Deakins) between Rubin and
Griffith.  From that point on, the film never ceases to amaze us.
Presented in a non-linear form with a heavy dosage of drama, and solid
acting across the board, "Hurricane" ends up a real KO.  Of admirable
merit are Jewison's top-notch directing, Denzel Washington's superbly
complex and multi-layered performance and the fascinating story of
Carter adapted for the screen by Armyan Bernstein and Dan Gordon.
Rubin "Hurricane" Carter was a great boxer, possibly one of the
greatest of all time.  The film chronicles his life from childhood to
his wrongful murder conviction because of a corrupt cop (Dan Hedaya) to
his triumphant release from prison.  How he got out of jail after being
imprisoned for 20 years is an "incredible" true story.
After reading Carter's book, Lesra Martin feels a deep connection
between himself and the author and decides to seek him out.  He writes
a letter and after getting a reply, visits Hurricane in jail.  The two
have a meaningful conversation that makes Lesra enlist the help of the
three Canadians (Liev Schreiber, Deborah Unger & John Hannah) he's
living with to come and help him free Rubin "Hurricane" Carter.
Denzel Washington does a great job of playing African Americans
oppressed by the Caucasian race as evidenced by his multiple awards for
playing those kinds of roles.  He's the best at doing characters like
Malcolm X in "Malcolm X," Trip in  "Glory," or Rubin Carter in "The
Hurricane."  He has the ability to transform into these characters,
both physically and mentally.  Washington gave this film everything he
had and it shows.  Throughout "Hurricane," there's not one scene where
we're watching Denzel Washington, we're always watching Rubin.  In my
humble opinion, I think he gives the best male performance of 1999.
In addition to Washington, there's a great supporting cast headed by
Vicellous Reon Shannon.  It gives me a warm and fuzzy feeling inside to
say that this is a talented young actor that we should keep an eye on,
especially with this being the year of praise heaped upon such
overrated prodigies as Haley Joel Osment.  Shannon shows a skillful
amount of range in his role of Lesra Martin, a role that will probably
go underrated.
Then there's Dan Hedaya, resplendent as always as the conspicuous
police lieutenant who's trying to keep the black man (In this case,
Rubin Carter) down.  There's nothing like a really good antagonist to
make a film complete.  Unless of course, it's the king of over the top
actors, Rod Steiger!  Fresh from the ruins of "End of Days," he's here
in a superincumbent role as the judge for the big courtroom climax.
With so many biographies being made into films these days, it's
refreshing to see one as good as this.  "The Hurricane" is one that
actually had everyone pour their heart and soul into it.

Author
James Brundage
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/6bc44eb43d6bf1ef88256879000a7ed5?OpenDocument
Written by Armyan Berstein and Dan Gordon
Produced by Armyan Berstein, Norman Jewison, John Ketcham
Starring Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Deborah Kara Unger,
Liev Schreiber, John Hannah, Dan Heyada
 If anyone even dares to hum the lyrics of the Bob Dylan song, I'm going
to have to kill them.  All right.  So this is an empty threat.  I have
zero way of knowing whether or not you are humming the Bob Dylan song
just to spite me, but please don't do it anyway.  After seeing The
Hurricane, I have Bob Dylan stuck in my head.
 In fact, Bob Dylan and Denzel Washington are about the only things
stuck in my head after that movie that and enormous sense of racial
injustice and a newfound respect for the residents of Toronto.
 The Hurricane is the story of Rubin `Hurricane' Carter, welterweight
champion who was wrongfully imprisoned for a triple-murder that he
didn't commit.  To clear this up to younger readers, this actually
happened. Although the wrongfully-imprisoned genre film is terribly
passé at this point in time, having a falsely accused man in prison is
something worth making into a movie again.
 The question, walking into The Hurricane, was whether making a
`wrongfully accused' movie is a viable option after the genre has been
sucked dry by fictional (or semi-fictional) counterparts such as The
Fugitive, U.S. Marshals, Double Jeopardy, and Wrongfully Accused.
 To its credit, The Hurricane shows us that such a film is possible.
 Most of the credit in this case goes to Denzel Washington, who I now am
absolutely sure deserved the Golden Globe he won for Best Actor.
Washington is in flawless form here, pushing every emotional button in
the book.  He is able to take a character that would otherwise be
contrived and make it into something new and impressive.  The film is
carried squarely on Washington's shoulders, and the result is a
potentially terrible film is turned into something that jerks a tear or
two out of even the most heartless of viewer (or critic).
 The big flaws in the movie come in the form of the writers, who are
dead-set convinced that the story of Rubin Carter (which, face it, would
have been better as a documentary) needed a little extra oomph.  To add
said oomph, the film takes poetic license and creates a corrupt cop (Den
Heyada) out of thin air.  To add even more oomph, the film takes more
poetic license with the do-good Canucks (Schrieber, Unger, and Hannah),
who are portrayed as the major detectives of the film.  Being as the
film is more based-on-a-true story than actual biopic, the Canucks are
placed in a large degree of artificial danger from a possibly imaginary
web of New Jersey corruption stretching all of the way up to Christie
Todd Whitman (all right, to whomever was New Jersey's governor at the
time).  We know the Garden State is screwy, but not that screwy.
 Said poetic license, contrived events and characters, make The
Hurricane terribly difficult for anyone who is an admirer of Rubin
Carter to take easily.  Scorcese fans, on the other hand, will be
undoubtedly pissed by the Raging Bull knock-offs that pose as fight
scenes.
 In the end, however, when all is said and done, Denzel Washington has
made pearls out of swine.  Without Denzel Washington, The Hurricane
would just be another contrived prison-drama, whether or not it actually
happened.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Eugene Novikov
 Starring Denzel Washington, John Hannah, Deborah Kara Unger, Liev
Schreiber, Dan Hedaya, Vicellous Reon Shannon. Rated R.
Some movies' pre-release buzz is so insistent on their high Oscar
potential that when they're finally released, everyone just goes along
with it. Thus sometimes, films unworthy of any award sans the Razzie
become Oscar hopefuls and some even score nominations. Last year it was
The Thin Red Line. This year's "winner" is The Hurricane, pure
unadulterated tripe that is all of a sudden being received with
critical plaudits and votes in the office Oscar pool.
Acclaimed director Norman Jewison's biopic retreads all the conventions
of courtroom movies without any of the fun. And that's supposed to be
ok because, see, it's a true story. It's about Rubin "Hurricane" Carter
(Denzel Washington), a legendary African American prizefighted who is
unjustly convicted of triple homicide with the help of a ghastly
(racist!) detective (Dan Hedaya) who's had it in for the "big-shot"
Hurricane ever since he arrested him for stabbing a white man with a
knife (in self-defense but who cares, right?) when Rubin was only ten.
He is to serve three life sentences with no possibility of parole. Most
of the film takes place when he is in his 15th year in prison.
To the rescue -- Lesra Martin (Vicellous Reon Shannon) and his team of
wanna-be detectives. Lesra is an African American teenager taken in by
three well-off Canadian white people (Hanna, Unger, Schreiber) to get
an education. Lesra and his buddies go to a book sale where Lesra picks
out his very first book -- "The Sixteenth Round," Rubin's
autobiography. Immediately thereafter, Schreiber's character tells
Lesra "Sometimes we don't pick the books we read, they pick us." Hmmm.
After a few visits to the prison, they become convinced of Rubin's
innocence and launch their own full-scale investigation even though two
juries have convicted him. They meticulously go through all the files
and revisit all the old witnesses (I wonder if any of them might be
cranky old women who slam the door in their faces?) and in the course
of their relentlessy tedious sleuthing uncover obvious evidence
confirming the Hurricane's innocence that was either ignored or never
seeked out during the first two proceedings. Of course, we're already
told that he's innocent.
A movie like this is especially frustrating because we're not being
shown everything significant that happened to Carter during this period
in his life. All too obviously, we're getting the Hollywood watered-
down version. That would be ok except that the parts we are getting is
milked for every single drop of melodrama that the filmmakers could
possibly squeeze out of it. It's almost cruel. The melodrama isn't of
the entertaining kind either; it's the hokey, rammed-down-your-throat
variety where every emotion is exaggerated to the point of absurdity.
Witness the villain ferociously grinding his teeth at the final trial
or the constant pseudo-saintliness of our four protagonists.
The Hurricane is your basic courtroom movie except it's a no-frills
courtroom movie. It's formula stripped to the bare necessities. You
have your wrongly accused black man. You have your melodramatic final
courtroom scene. But there's nothing else. You'd expect some sort of
involving investigation. But that's not necessary since we're
implicitly informed of his innocence. Thus the whole middle portion of
the movie is reduced to the protagonist brooding. Brooding to himself.
Brooding to other inmates. Brooding to Lesra. Brooding to Lesra's
Canadian friends. Brooding in letters. I don't think I'll ever look at
brooding the same way again. It wasn't long before I got tired of
hearing the Hurricane's exceedingly deep meditations on his condition.
I wanted something to happen.
As for Washington's performance in the title role -- I figured I'd have
to address it sooner or later considering the amount of attention it's
received -- he is top notch, though still boring. How is that possible?
Well, he does what Jewison wanted him to do perfectly. Unfortunately
what Jewison asked him to do is a load of crap. What a waste of a great
performer.
Speaking of wastes, why the hell did John Hannah agree to do this? He's
an extremely talented actor and I love him dearly, but what is he doing
here? To call his character (along with Schreiber's and Unger's) a
stick figure would be a gross understatement. All three of them come
off as veritable Mother Theresas, as benevolent as do-gooders come. If
they're to play a major part in this movie, why not make them real
people, with real feelings and emotions?
Look: if you're going to make a formula movie, don't undermine the
formula. Courtroom dramas can be fun, but this is ridiculous. Not only
is it trite, it's boring.

Author
Jamey Hughton
Starring-Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon,
Liev Schreiber, Deborah Kara Unger and John Hannah
Director-Norman Jewison
Canadian Rating-PG
Released by Universal Pictures - 01/00
`The Hurricane', the true story of wrongly convicted boxer Rubin
`Hurricane' Carter, is obviously a burden of love on behalf on the
filmmakers. In particular, the commendable effort of Canadian director
Norman Jewison speaks nothing but painstaking dedication. Jewison has
extracted every possible ounce of compelling drama out of Carter's
inspirational battle for justice, and channeled it into a stunningly
powerful biography. The man with center-stage, however, is Denzel
Washington.
Washington's commanding, heartfelt performance as the title character
only further justifies the fact that he could be the best actor working
in Hollywood today. His seductive puppy-dog eyes and polished speech
mannerisms entrance the viewer, and from there, the effortless nuance
and understated power of character take over. Washington's deeply
affecting portrayal of The Hurricane is just another impressive file to
add into the great performance cabinet of 1999, but there is something
that makes this one stand out. Perhaps it's because his characterization
is based upon that of an actual individual, and that Carter's story is
already compelling and touching before being formatted to a theatrical
biography. But it's Denzel who goes that extra yard to identify with the
racial injustice that Carter dealt with, and all the while remaining
loyal and true to his story. It's almost unfortunate that bits and
pieces of `The Hurricane' are too conventional, and that dramatic
authority is lacking during a few crucial moments.
The Hurricane's story begins in the boxing ring, just as Carter has
upset the favored defender and become the new Welter Weight Champion.
But there is one determined obstacle in his journey to fame: racism.
Carter is wrongly accused for a multiple-homicide by a racist police
officer (Dan Hedaya) who has hounded him since he was 11-years old. Of
course, the ruling tips in favor of his guilt, and in 1966 Carter is
sentenced to prison for the remainder of his natural life. At this
point, Jewison has more than persuaded the audience that the world is a
cruel and unjust place. But there is a faint light of hope at the end of
The Hurricane's tunnel, and that hope lies within a small group of
Canadians who would rally to set him free. Lesra Martin (Vicellous Reon
Shannon), a Brooklyn youth being tutored in Toronto by three Canadian
adults, manages to find a copy of The Hurricane's autobiography, `The
Sixteenth Round'. Lesra is deeply moved by the story, and feels
compelled to meet Carter in person and somehow bring his case to a
Federal court.
`The Hurricane' is powerful stuff. Mind you, it's also a constant uphill
battle to establish some of the essential dramatic details. Jewison
crafts a beautiful story with a potent emotional backbone, only fumbling
the ball on a few childhood flashbacks, which are brief and rather
unconvincing. All of the performances are stellar. Although they are
never granted more than a peripheral outlook, Liev Schreiber, Deborah
Kara Unger and John Hannah are excellent in their roles as the
courageous Canadian trio who fight valiantly for Hurricane's freedom.
Dan Hedaya succeeds in making us want to put his character through a
meat grinder. The remainder of supporting cast includes David Paymer and
Rod Steiger, both playing small but equally pivotal roles. The
screenplay in `The Hurricane' borders on cliché too often, including an
excessive good cop-bad cop scenario, but the performances and steadfast
direction never taper off course.
Washington's performance is a great one in a semi-great movie. Another
component that is thankfully added is the believable and ultimately
heartfelt relationship between Rubin and Lesra. There is a sense of
discovery with their interaction together. It's a great feeling, just as
it must have been for the real Hurricane upon his first meeting with
this young Brooklyn lad who had identified with his novel. This
feel-good message adds fuel to the powerful fire of `The Hurricane', and
helps it overcome the conventional flaws that simmer within it's
screenplay. Of course, it all boils down to the Canadians gathering
information and connecting the dots of various witness statements to
find the proper documents for the courts to release Hurricane from
prison. Even though the finale is slightly melodramatic and easy to
anticipate, the message of `The Hurricane' radiates throughout this
inspirational biography.
`Hate put me in prison. Love's gonna bust me out'. As soon as Washington
speaks these words, we realize our journey has been worthwhile. Just as
justice does for Mr. Rubin Carter, `The Hurricane' prevails in the end.
Your Comments Appreciated!  movieviews@hotmail.com
NEW Site Look - Logos/Buttons/Review & Homepage Designs
        "Best & Worst of '99"  and More at:
    http://Welcome.to/MovieViews
   MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Denzel Washington has never been afraid to play the part of a man who
triumphs in the face of adversity, and this true life tale of Rubin Carter,
a man who was wrongly imprisoned for over 19 years, sure fits that bill to
the tee. Washington shines in another great role which actually has you
feeling some of the pain and anguish of a man, whose unimaginable ordeal
could only make one wonder about the absurdity of our own everyday
insignificant complaints.
PLOT:
Rubin "Hurricane" Carter, a champion boxer, is wrongly convicted of a murder
and spends close to twenty years in prison. Appeal after appeal, march after
march and outcry after outcry does not set this man free, until the day that
a young black man picks up his book at a fair, and along with his three
Canadian friends, attempt to free the man who has been unjustly placed
behind bars for the better half of his life.
CRITIQUE:
A powerful, moving and emotional drama ready to replenish you with spirit
and determination in the face of adversity, while demonstrating once again,
the superior acting talents of a man who goes by the name of Denzel
Washington. In fact, his cohort in this film, Vicellous Reon Shannon, also
swings the bat for a homer in his first major role, as the duo combine to
draw some believable faces onto a story which is just too unbelievable to
imagine. Don't get me wrong, despite it being a true-to-life story, it is
all too sad to have to admit that I had heard plenty of similar tales
beforehand, but thankfully for us all, the magical touch of Denzel
Washington just made this film invigorating and inspiring to behold. And
yes, I hope to God the Academy tips their hat to this wonderful actor once
again this time around. He plays him cocky, he plays him blissful, he plays
him violent, he plays him soft-spoken, in fact, he plays the man through
many of the colors that he explored throughout his lifetime. The story, a
classic, is one of triumph over adversity, persistence over resignation,
love over hate, and ultimately, one of justice over injustice, but truly it
speaks of the power of the human spirit.
Would any one of us have been able to survive the terrible ordeal that this
man had to endure for all those years? Everything taken away from him. His
life, his job, his kids, his wife, his dignity, his everything! And what do
you say about those four people who decided to dedicate their entire lives
to getting this man out of prison? A man who they barely knew! Yes, even the
"Hurricane" himself said that he would not have been able to do that for
another. Actually, that was the one part of the story which I wished they
had explored further. Those Canadians. What was their story? Who were they
really? The film barely speaks of them in detailed terms and skates around
the issue of their actual professions, and even their ultimate intentions to
do the things that they did. Don't get me wrong, they are admirable without
a doubt, but I would have liked to have known more about them (The Little
Known Facts below might shed a little light on that, JoBlo :). The film was
also a little slow at parts, but I think the pacing was done purposely in
order for us to better appreciate the snail-like grind of this man's
solitary experience. All in all, the secondary actors all could have been
snapped up a notch or two, but none of that really mattered much with the
knockout performance from Denzel as Rubin.
Rarely does a film transcend the level of a good film and become one with
greater connotations simply because of its lead performance, but THE
HURRICANE is just that. Now give that man an Oscar, dammit!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
A recent interview with the real Rubin Carter and Lesra Martin on the Oprah
Winfrey show confirmed a couple of greater coincidences in their life
stories which were not accurately depicted in the film.
1. For one, the first letter which Lesra wrote to Rubin in jail, was
actually just one letter amongst the hundreds of messages that Hurricane
would receive in jail. In fact, he never wrote back to any of them, but for
some strange and inexplicable reason, he found himself spiritually attracted
to that one letter in the pack. He opened it, read it and was deeply touched
by it. As per the film, Rubin finally sat down at his typewriter and wrote
Lesra back a thank-you letter. The rest...is history.
2. A similar experience overcame Lesra when he first spotted Rubin's book at
the Toronto book fair. In fact, he felt as though the cover of the book
itself "spoke to him", and actually spent around two hours following the man
who was holding the book at the fair, until he finally dropped it and Lesra
made it his own purchase.
To clear up the "Canadians question", it turns out that in the actual story,
there were nine Canadians who lived and worked together on the Carter case.
However, for the sake of developing well-rounded and believable characters
with whom the audience could relate, the nine became three. Those folks were
basically the three who actually went to New Jersey and did most of the
legwork on the case.
This film is based on two books. The first was written by the man on whom
the entire film is based, Rubin "Hurricane" Carter, and his book called "The
16th Round", and the other was written by two men, Sam Chaiton and Terry
Swinton, whose novel is entitled "Lazarus and the Hurricane". In fact, the
film's original title was LAZARUS AND THE HURRICANE.
To prepare for his role as boxer Rubin "Hurricane" Carter, Denzel Washington
apparently worked out for a year with trainer Terry Claybon and lost a total
of 44 pounds.

Author
Steve Rhodes
"Innocence is a highly overrated commodity," says Rubin 'Hurricane'
Carter. He should know, he's spent most of his life in prison, unjustly
accused. The riveting movie, THE HURRICANE, is based on Hurricane
Carter's true story. Directed with loving intensity by Norman Jewison
(IN THE HEAT OF THE NIGHT and A SOLDIER'S STORY) and starring Denzel
Washington as Hurricane Carter, in a powerfully moving performance, the
riveting movie is likely to earn them both Oscar nominations.
The script by Armyan Bernstein and Dan Gordon, based on the book
"Lazarus and the Hurricane" by Sam Chaiton and Terry Swinton and the
book "The 16th Round" by Carter himself, manages to tell a complex,
decades-long story lucidly. Only in the middle section does the director
allow his movie to meander for a bit, but he more than makes up for a
slack 15 minutes or so with his rousing last act.
Cutting back and forth between timeframes, the movie tells Hurricane's
story. Starting off in 1963 at the height of his career, we witness his
triumphs in the boxing ring as he rises rapidly to become the
welterweight champion of the world. "One thing I could do was box," he
says in his book, spoken in voice-over by Washington. "I tasted my own
blood, and I loved it."
The boxing matches are shot by Roger Deakins (FARGO) in high-contrast
black and white, looking like they did when we watched them on
television. (The rest of the movie is in color.)  The mainly white, male
audiences root for him like Roman senators cheering on their favorite
gladiator. Carter, who won fight after fight, frequently with first
round knock-outs, rarely disappoints his fans.
After we witness his success at capturing the title, we jump abruptly to
10 years later in which Carter, now a prison inmate serving three life
sentences, is angry and determined. Jewison convincingly creates Carter
as a black Gandhi. Carter starts off his prison stay with 90 days in the
hole since he refuses to wear prison uniforms, which he feels would be
admitting he was guilty.
Jewison makes the movie as much a detective story as a social commentary
and biography. Cutting back to the crime scene, we witness two men,
reportedly black, walk into a bar in the wee hours of the morning and
murder the occupants for no obvious reason. The chances that the current
world boxing champion would do this are close to zero. The police,
however, led by a shifty-eyed officer (Dan Hedaya, last seen charmingly
as President Nixon in DICK), try to pin the crime on Carter by tampering
with evidence and witnesses. The full extent of their manipulation
becomes apparent as the story advances.
When first stopped by the police, Carter just shakes his head. He and
another man have just left a party at another bar. "We're looking for
two Negroes in a white car," the friendly patrol officer says. "Any two
will do?" Carter laughingly replies with a tinge of bitter sarcasm. He's
been harassed by cops all of his life, but he's the king of the boxing
world now and figures he no longer has anything to fear. Still, he
resents being harassed. The situation goes from bad to worse when the
police haul him into the emergency room. A semi-conscious witness with
eyes full of blood is asked again and again whether Carter and his
companion were the shooters. Not taking "no" for an answer, the cops
press on, demanding that the witness give some sign that indicates the
answer that they want.
In a part of the story that would be laughed off as ridiculously
schmaltzy were it not true, four people come to Carter's aid late in his
life after he has languished in prison for decades. Although the rich
and famous tried to help him earlier, to no avail, three Canadian adults
(Deborah Unger, John Hannah, Liev Schreiber) and one Brooklyn ghetto
teenager, Lesra (Vicellous Shannon), bravely come to his rescue. The
adults, who live together fixing up homes, have temporarily adopted
Lesra, a bright kid whom the public schools have failed, in order to get
him ready for college. For 25 cents, the first book Lesra ever buys is
Carter's. This eventually sends them off on a journey of love and
dedication.
Rod Steiger, who as the judge du jour seems to appear in every crime
drama this year, is finally given the respect he deserves and allowed in
this movie to play the part of a judge without parody.
The best stories constantly surprise us, which is certainly true of this
one. One particularly effective scene has Carter, who prides himself on
being a "warrior scholar," talking passionately about the power and
magic of writing. Since that is my personal joy, I had this strange
feeling that he speaking directly to me. Like one of those paintings in
which the eyes follow only you wherever you walk, this movie speaks to
each of us and contains many more messages than you might guess. A
picture that can be enjoyed and appreciated on many levels, it is a
stunning piece of work that deserves high praise and big box office
receipts.
THE HURRICANE runs 2:30. It is rated R for language and some violence
and would be fine for teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Scott Renshaw
(Universal)
Starring:  Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Deborah Kara Unger,
Liev Schreiber, John Hannah, Dan Hedaya, Debbi Morgan, Clancy Brown.
Screenplay:  Armyan Bernstein and Dan Gordon, based on _The Sixtheenth
Round_ by Rubin "Hurricane" Carter and _Lazarus and the Hurricane_ by Sam
Chaiton and Terry Swinton.
Producers:  Armyan Bernstein, John Ketcham and Norman Jewison.
Director:  Norman Jewison.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, violence)
Running Time:  146 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There are times when I'm watching a film and I just know it has
fallen victim the demon Expectations. Audiences expect certain things from
certain kind of films -- they expect love stories to end with a kiss, they
expect horror films to end with a jolt, they expect action films to end
with a big chase and/or a big explosion. The ebb and flow of traditional
narrative becomes part of the way people watch movies, and film-makers
know this. The familiarity is comforting; it makes it easy for people to
keep up. Scripts are structured not exactly to give the people what they
want, but to give them what they know -- which, for all practical
purposes, is the same thing.
     THE HURRICANE is a drama that follows a legal proceding, and it gives
the audience what they expect by ending with a verdict. It's also a
disappointing resolution for a story that's actually about so much more
than guilt or innocence. The subject is real-life boxer Rubin "Hurricane" 
Carter (Denzel Washington), a middleweight contender whose hard life takes
its hardest turn when he is convicted in a robbery/murder case and
sentenced to life in prison. Carter never stops insisting on his
innocence, however, and eventually turns his story into an autobiography
called _The Sixteenth Round_. That book finds its way into the hands of
Lesra (Vicellous Reon Shannon), an African-American teen learning at last
to read with the help of three Canadian social activist/guardians: Lisa
(Deborah Kara Unger), Terry (John Hannah) and Sam (Liev Schreiber). When
Lesra becomes convinced Carter has been wrongly accused, he enlists the
aid of "The Canadians" to free "The Hurricane" after nearly 20 years in
prison.
     The heart and soul of THE HURRICANE comes from the relationship
between Carter and Lesra, a relationship that begins as a pen pal
correspondence and climaxes with an emotional prison visit between the
two. Once THE HURRICANE finds that hook, it truly begins to soar. The
biographical background material, which had felt somewhat labored, starts
to flesh out a portrait of Carter's background of distrust of any force
outside himself. Denzel Washington, after a number of roles in which his
commanding presence was lost on mediocre material, turns Carter into a
character with a fascinating arc. After growing inward for years as a
defense mechanism, Carter finds himself in the dangerous position of
growing to care once again about life in the outside world. Watching him
overcome his initial suspicion of the Canadians' motives is intriguing;
watching him begin to collapse under the burden of hope is engrossing.
     That dynamic -- the tense relationships between Carter and those who
sought to help him, and how he responds to their efforts -- is what THE
HURRICANE is really about. Unfortunately, the script begins taking the
story into predictable, uninspired directions. The Canadians encounter
road blocks from reluctant would-be witnesses; they're harrassed by the
racist police detective (Dan Hedaya) who originally engineered the
frame-up. The investigation consistently suffers from a sense of
manufactured drama, as well as from the complete absence of character
development for the three Canadians (they've been compressed from nine
real-life individuals, so we can be thankful for small favors). It's
obvious we're heading for a showdown before the bench, and a series of
impassioned speeches about justice. And frankly, I didn't really care,
because I knew every minute spent on the details of the case was a minute
not spent exploring Carter as a character.
     There is far too much to like about Washington's performance -- and,
to give credit where it's due, about newcomer Shannon's performance as
well -- for THE HURRICANE not to be ultimately satisfying. The agonizing
sequence that finds Carter slowly losing his mind in solitary confinement
is a particular triumph; no other film has ever made the loneliness of
one's own thoughts seem like such a punishment. THE HURRICANE simply loses
focus on its strengths at times, wandering into familiar territory for its
emotional catharsis. In a sense, Armyan Bernstein and Dan Gordon deserve
kudos for finding a compelling perspective in fusing their two source
materials. It's hard not to wish that the film hadn't been more willing
to let the audience find that perspective as well.

Author
Greg King
THE HURRICANE (M).  
(Warner Bros/Beacon/Village Roadshow)
Director: Norman Jewison
Stars: Denzel Washington, Deborah Kara Unger, Liev Schreiber, John 
Hannah, Vicellous Reon Shannaon, Dan Hedaya, David paymer, Harris Yulin,
Rod Steiger, Clancy Brown, Al Waxman, David Lansbury, Garland Whitt,
Badja Djola
Running time: 156 minutes.
        Here comes the story of Rubin "Hurricane" Carter, the boxer
who was framed for a murder he didn't commit and spent the next 22
years fighting to prove his innocence.  Carter's story was first made
famous through Bob Dylan's song, which resonates throughout the film,
but The Hurricane continues the story up to the present day.
Writers Dan Gordon and Armyan Bernstein take numerous
liberties with the truth, changing many of the facts for dramatic
purposes.  In the process, The Hurricane becomes a powerful howl of
outrage against the volatile climate of racial tension and intolerance
that led to a blatant miscarriage of justice.  Director Norman Jewison
has explored these themes before, most notably in the Oscar winning
classic In The Heat Of The Night and A Soldier's Story, and his
obvious passion shapes this epic film into an overtly manipulative yet
compelling and moving experience.
The fight to clear his name is taken up in earnest when the
barely literate 13 year old Lesra Martin (Vicellous Reon Shannon, a
regular on tv series Dangerous Minds, etc) purchases a copy of
Carter's autobiography for 25 cents at a book sale.  Lesra has been
taken under the wing of three liberal Canadians (Liev Schreiber,
Deborah Kara Unger, from Crash, etc, and Sliding Doors' John Hannah),
who take him from the slums of Brooklyn to improve his education.
Inspired by Carter's book, Lesra begins a correspondence with the
imprisoned boxer that changes both their lives.  Embittered and
disillusioned by his experience, Carter (superbly played by Denzel
Washington in one of the best performances of his career) begins to
trust the young Lesra, and an unlikely but ultimately inspiring
friendship develops.  Convinced by Lesra's belief in Carter's
innocence, his three guardians begin to investigate the case
themselves, hoping to find the crucial evidence that will overturn the
wrongful conviction.
They are dealing with a case in which the tainted evidence is
firmly buried in the past.  Many key witnesses are long dead, and some
of the remaining players, like corrupt racist cop Della Pesca (Dan
Hedaya), want to ensure it remains closed.  Eventually the three
amateur sleuths triumph, as Federal Court Judge Sarokin (Rod Steiger)
overturns the conviction and sets Carter free.
Unlike other more conventional biopics about champion boxers
(Somebody Up There Likes Me, The Greatest, and Martin Scorsese's
blistering Raging Bull, etc) The Hurricane is as much as a powerful
prison drama, with overtones of The Shawshank Redemption, and a
stirring quest for justice as it is the story of a fighter who could
have been the champion of the world.  Jewison has taken a leaf out of
Scorsese's book, and had veteran cinematographer Roger Deakins film
the brutal boxing scenes in glorious black and white.
But The Hurricane is not merely the story of Carter's search
for justice and redemption - it is also Lesra's story.  Jewison draws
wonderful parallels between the pair - one imprisoned by racial hatred
and prejudice and searching for justice, the other largely imprisoned
by the impoverishment of his background and struggling for direction.
However, some of the peripheral characters, such as Hedaya's corrupt
cop and the three Canadians, are clumsily sketched and remain largely
stereotyped and ill-defined The stellar cast struggle against an often
impoverished script to bring their underdeveloped characters to life.
Fittingly enough, The Hurricane is Washington's film, and his
powerful presence dominates the screen.  He brings an innate sense of
dignity to every role he plays, but here he also brings a palpable
sense of anger and vehemence to his powerful performance.  Washington
is thoroughly convincing in a complex role that requires him to age
some 20 years and run a gamut of emotions.  Steiger's brief appearance
as the judge is certainly flamboyant, but, thankfully, less erratic
than his recent scene stealing turn in a similar role in the recent
Crazy In Alabama.
With The Hurricane, Jewison wears his heart openly on his
sleeve, which leads to some moments that are manipulative, clichéd
and saccharine.  However, it's a measure of Jewison's earnest and
impassioned approach that Carter can utter a line as potentially
clichéd as "Hate put me in this prison, but love is going to set me
free" and reduce an audience to tears rather than howls of derision.

Author
Jason Wallis
The Hurricane (1999)
Rating (out of five): ****
Starring Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Deborah Unger, Liev
Schreiber, John Hannah, Dan Hedaya, Debbi Morgan, David Paymer,
Vinny Pastore and Rod Steiger
Directed by Norman Jewison
Written by Sam Chaiton (based on a book by Rubin "Hurricane" Carter)
Rated R for violence and profanity
Theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1
Released in 1999
Running 155 minutes
The life story of boxer Rubin "Hurricane" Carter is full of so many powerful
and harrowing emotions that you'd think it would be impossible to express it
all on a movie screen. Filled to the brim with themes of hope, love,
sacrifice and courage, The Hurricane is one of the most absorbing and
spiritually uplifting movies of the year.
Denzel Washington's new film tells Carter's turbulent story in admirable
fashion, providing those of us who previously knew nothing of the Hurricane'
s plight with a wealth of fascinating insight.
How turbulent was his life, you may ask? For starters, at age eleven, Carter
was sent to a juvenile prison (and remained there for almost ten years) for
a simple act of self-defense, and in his adult life was framed for three
murders by the same police officer who haunted his childhood. But Carter
carried the title of "the Hurricane" for a reason - for the twenty years
that he was held in the custody of New Jersey state, he never submitted to
his oppressors, nor did he give up his dignity by wearing the uniform of a
convict.
While behind bars, he became friend and mentor to a troubled black youth who
read the memoirs of the wrongly-jailed boxer and was so struck by the tale
that he formed a pen pal relationship with the Hurricane. It was he, along
with a group of Canadian freedom fighters, that eventually helped to
orchestrate Carter's extradition from prison (made even more compelling by a
heated courtroom finish in which the hero must stand up to the racist legal
system that ruined his life).
Of course, who knows exactly how much of the information we are being fed is
true? Rumor has it that the real Rubin "Hurricane" Carter was not such a
pleasant guy, that the touched-up film version of his life smoothed out the
rougher edges of his personality in order to make their hero more likable
and accessible to the general public. The facts of the case have also been
accused of being slightly distorted in an attempt to fit Hollywood's
standards of a "crowd-pleaser" (indeed, the storytelling techniques can seem
a little too by-the-numbers at times).
Then again, The Hurricane never claimed to be a documentary. Employing the
concept of artistic license to its fullest potential, director Norman
Jewison (who, after In the Heat of the Night, is no stranger to films
dealing with racism) has crafted a fine picture. Aided by a stellar cast of
performers (including Washington, who just recently took home a Golden Globe
for his turn as the world-weary boxer), he has made something to move and
inspire us all.
*Find all of Jason's reviews at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Author
John Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
Growing up as the child of dirty hippies, I was introduced to the plight
of Ruben `Hurricane' Carter at an early age.  Via the Bob Dylan song, I
learned that Carter was the number one contender for the middleweight
boxing title until he was accused, falsely tried and convicted of a
grisly triple murder by an all-white jury.  The song also detailed the
cover-ups, witness tampering and corruption ranging from the local
police to the judge that handed Carter his life sentence.  Pretty heavy
subject matter for a song (thank God that Dylan was writing in blank
verse), not to mention my five-year-old brain.  The tale seemed
inconceivable, even to a kid whose biggest concern was trying to get the
brake on his Big Wheel to make him spin to a groovy halt.
Still, I approached the film with apprehension.  First, you have to
consider the fact that you're basically seeing a movie that will offer
no surprises.  It's a biopic and, like Man on the Moon, based on
real-life events that most people already know.  Then there's director
Norman Jewison.  He's made some decent films, especially when he focuses
on racial injustice, but his last two (Bogus and Only You) really stunk
up the joint.  And then there's Denzel Washington (The Bone Collector),
an actor who, in my opinion, is one of the most overrated in the
business (it's a photo-finish with Liam Neeson).  But since The
Hurricane has already been praised by critics worldwide, I felt I should
probably check my preconceptions at the box office window.
Hurricane is a good film.  Is it a Best Picture candidate?  Absolutely
not.  Does it belong on Top Ten lists?  Not unless you've only seen two
dozen movies in 1999.  I'm not even sure that you can call the film
entertaining, considering the depressing material and lack of
surprises.  It is simply a good film.
Among its strengths is the way the film is assembled.  Instead of going
for the simple, linear, timeline approach, Jewison skips from Carter's
welterweight title fight in 1963; to the release of his novel, `The 16th
Round,' in 1973; to the murders in 1966; to Carter's youth in Patterson,
New Jersey; to the `present day,' when a group of Canadians lead a fight
to free the imprisoned boxer.  Jewison is able to pull this off without
Hurricane seeming too jumpy or confusing.
Also commendable is Roger Deakins' (The Big Lebowski) cinematography,
which is fantastic without being intrusive.  His camera-work, especially
during the grainy black-and-white fight, is quite remarkable.  At this
point in post-Raging Bull cinema, it's almost a requirement that all
fight scenes be filmed in black-and-white, but Deakins does more than
just use black-and-white stock:  He gives these scenes such a dated look
that you can almost hear Howard Cosell calling the action.
But the biggest surprise of all is Washington, who does a really great
job in the titular role.  The usually one-dimensional actor manages to
appear angry, scared and delusional at the same time.  There is one
standout scene where he meets with his lawyers and they do that whole
talking-on-the-phone-separated-by-a-thick-pane-of-glass thing.
Washington gets so worked up that his side of the glass starts to get
steamed up.  Or maybe he just had really bad gas.
Hurricane certainly isn't without flaws, though.  It's one slow-moving
train, punctuated by a tedious scene of Carter in `the hole.'  It feels
like we're watching the entire ninety-day ordeal play out in real time.
I also have a big problem with the creation of the fictional character
Detective Vincent Della Pesca (Dan Hedaya, Dick).  The detective is
portrayed as a bigot that sat around and dreamed up ways to incarcerate
Carter.  Sound familiar?  It should - it's the O.J. defense.  While I
understand his inclusion intends to illustrate the corruption of the
system, it's really hard to swallow.  I'm sure that law enforcement
officers wish they had this kind of free time on their hands.  The
character does nothing but potentially incite hatred toward police.  And
that just leaves a bad taste in my mouth.
2:25 - R for adult language, violence and racial stuff

Author
Walter Frith
Norman Jewison's attachment to racial issues in film is hardly new for the
great director.  Before 'The Hurricane', he has tackled the issue with two
of Hollywood's more under appreciated films, 'In the Heat of the Night' and
'A Soldier's Story' (which helped Denzel Washington gain major recognition).
Neither film made the 1998 list of 100 greatest films as selected by the
American Film Institute and the latter wasn't even a nominee in the final
400 nominees out of 40,000 American films from the first century of film
1896-1996.  In fact, from 'The Cincinnati Kid' to 'Fiddler on the Roof' to
'Moonstruck', Jewison didn't get a film on the final 100 list and that's a
travesty.  As a fellow countryman from Canada, I admire Jewison's trek to
get international recognition and he still may win an Oscar one day.  But
'The Hurricane' won't earn him one.  This is an absorbing but slow moving
motion picture that only has one great performance from a cast that could
have performed in top fashion but didn't.
Many films have one great performance that save them from failure.  Michael
Douglas' Oscar winning performance in 1987's 'Wall Street' (the film
received no other Oscar nominations) was the only thing that helped the film
fight off charges that it was a sexist and chauvinistic portrayal of high
rollers in the financial world.  The film was also criticized for its nasty
portrayal of bankers and stock traders as all being evil, weak minded or
completely greedy.  Jack Palance's Oscar win in the 1991 caper 'City
Slickers' (the film received no other Oscar nominations) was more than a
career award.  In my opinion, Palance truly deserved to win but many thought
it was a year in which the Oscar then should have gone to Anthony Hopkins in
the supporting category for 'The Silence of the Lambs' (Hopkins WON in the
lead best actor category for having less than half an hour on screen in a
two hour film) and to Warren Beatty in 'Bugsy' in the leading actor
category.  And finally, Marisa Tomei's performance in 1992's 'My Cousin
Vinny' earned her a best supporting actress Oscar and the film, again,
received no other Oscar nominations.
At the time of this review, Denzel Washington stands alone in this film as
the only Oscar nominee.  He is nominated in the best actor category for 'The
Hurricane' and stands a good chance of winning.  His courageous performance
as a man standing almost alone against the system is one that reminded me of
Daniel Day-Lewis' performance in 1993's 'In the Name of the Father' as a man
wrongly sent to prison.
In 'The Hurricane' Denzel Washington portrays Rubin 'Hurricane' Carter.  In
the late 1960's, he was on his way to a glorious and successful boxing
career before it ended tragically at the satanic hands of racism.  The film
states that a New Jersey police officer name Det. Vincent Della Pesca (Dan
Hedaya) helped frame Carter in a multiple murder case and sent him to prison
for over 20 years before Carter had any real chance for his case to be heard
with new evidence.  Della Pesca had a run-in with Carter when Carter was a
little boy as Carter was brought in for assault (actually self defense) at
about the age of 10.  It was as situation where the boy looked guilty but
was very much innocent.
Carter writes a book about his trials and tribulations and many years after
his incarceration, Carter's book about his unjust prison sentence finds its
way into the hands of Lesra Martin (Vicellous Reon Shannon), a young black
teenager from Brooklyn, New York whose parents are alcoholics and Lesra is
adopted by a group of young Canadian commune individuals from Toronto,
Ontario, and is in part, raised by them in learning how to read and write
and be sent off to college to pursue his dream of becoming an attorney.
Lesra's passion is to meet Rubin Carter face to face in prison and tell him
that he believes in his cause and offers to help fight his conviction with
the help of his Canadian pals.  Their investigation sheds new light on
Carter's possible innocence and the information is presented before the law
for serious consideration.
Denzel Washington does it again.  He plays a real life character as he did
in his first Oscar nominated role as Steven Biko in 1987's 'Cry Freedom' and
his only other Oscar nomination in a leading role to date is for 1992's
'Malcolm X'.  Washington lets the layers of his acting ability do the
talking like other actors such as Gene Hackman, Nicolas Cage and Tom Hanks
who all use very little if no make-up and rely on good old fashioned
academics to enhance a movie.  As Rubin Carter, Washington has many points
in the film where he flat out carries the film himself.  'The Hurricane' is
long, drawn out and worth one viewing as far as I'm concerned but Denzel
Washington does his job and the film only thrives when he's on screen and
many would argue he's absent in this film a bit too much.  Still worth a
marginal recommendation, however, for Washington's amazing performance.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
John Beachem
Directed by: Norman Jewison
Written by: Rubin "Hurricane" Carter, Sam Chaiton
In the past I have stated that strong performances are incapable of saving an
otherwise weak film (1998's Hurlyburly being a perfect example of this). Denzel
Washington proves me wrong in "The Hurricane", the story of Rubin "Hurricane"
Carter. While the film itself is languid, overlong, and melodramatic,
Washington's performance is outstanding. Washington has, in fact, already
received a Golden Globe nomination for his role, and if he doesn't receive an
Oscar nomination to go along with this, someone in the academy is going to
hang.
Shot in two different time periods, the film tells the story of Rubin
"Hurricane" Carter (Denzel Washington). Portions of the film show Rubin's rise
to fame and troubles with the authorities. The time frame then shifts to
Rubin's days in prison and the efforts of a young man named Lesra (Vicellous
Reon Shannon) and his three Canadian teachers/foster parents (John Hannah, Liev
Schreiber, Deborah Unger) to free him. While the group searches for clues which
will help exonerate Carter, they are threatened and harassed by the racist cop
(Dan Hedaya) who pinned the murder on Rubin thirty years prior.
The majority of the film moves along at such a leisurely pace that I noticed
half of the audience drifting off. During these scenes, all one can do is wait
for Washington to show up and ignite the screen. However, not all of the film
is quite so sluggish. The scenes in which the Canadians hunt for clues move
along at a nice, brisk pace. The biggest fault perhaps lies in the amount of
time spent on Carter's younger days. For nearly half of the very long picture,
we watch Carter get cheated out of everything he's earned again and again.
During these scenes, we're shown Hedaya's vengeful Lieutenant Della Pesce
trying everything he can to have Carter locked up. The problem here is that
despite a great job by Hedaya (as always), the character has no personality.
He's evil, pure and simple. We're given nothing beyond this. In a movie like
"Star Wars" this works fine, but here we really need something more to make us
hate this character.
As for the performances here, I've already made clear how incredible Washington
is, but the majority of the supporting cast is really quite good as well. I
truly believe that Dan Hedaya can't help but act well. Liev Schrieber (Scream
2), Deborah Unger (The Game), and John Hannah (The Mummy) are all adequate at
their worst and entertaining at their best. Clancy Brown (Highlander) and Rod
Steiger (End of Days) both make fairly brief appearances, but both are talented
enough actors that it's a pleasure seeing them at all. The only weak link here
is Vicellous Reon Shannon. I'm not entirely sure if this is due to Shannon
himself, or the rather weak dialogue written for him. I lean towards the latter
because every now and then Shannon seems to break free and display some real
talent. 
"The Hurricane" is by no means a great movie. It can, however, be an
interesting one at times. The film runs 125 minutes, which would normally be a
good running time, but fifteen minutes or so of this movie could easily have
been chopped. "The Hurricane" is at its best when we see how Carter deals with
life in prison, which involves him cutting himself off from anything and anyone
he cared about. However, countless melodramatic scenes and a whole lot of
preaching keep the film from being anything more than fairly good. I'd
recommend waiting for video on this one, but do try and see it. 
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Author
Ross Anthony
Entitled "Hurricane" and whirling with hype, the film is good, but doesn't
quite pack the stormy punch you'd rightfully have anticipated. Less a fight
movie, and more a quiet emotional story of one man's endurance in the face
of racism and injustice.
In a black and white 1966 clip, boxer Ruben "Hurricane" Carter muscles his
helpless competitor to the canvas, woven into this sequence is a color 1974
sequence in which an imprisoned Carter prepares to defend himself against
reactionary guards. An excellent introduction after which the film
experiences an early lull of about a half-hour. Also the caption "7 years
later" appears on the screen confusing the time line issue (7 years from '66
or '74?).
Carter's autobiography serves as a convenient way to cover past history. The
stuttering stubborn boy who plays a child Ruben Carter sets the stage well
for the experienced Washington who is very good, but never breaks loose
(performance speaking). An hour or so into the film, a black teen (Lesra)
home-schooled by three white communal Canadians, becomes engrossed in
Carter's book "The 16th Round." This is when we as an audience are given a
sympathetic eye through which to view the drama. No longer innocent
by-standers, we become drawn into the ring by Lesras' passion and
compassion. It's the relationship between Ruben and Lesra that gives
"Hurricane" its thunder.
"Hate put me in prison, Love's gonna bust me out." The picture is seldom
short of this kind of schmaltz and Ruben is nearly always shown in a virtual
angelic light. Still, "Hurricane" endears, its positive message strongly
resonating.
Hurricane. Copyright Š 2000. Rated R.
Starring Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Deborah Kara Unger, Live
Schreiber, John Hannah, Dan Hedaya.
Directed by Norman Jewison.
Written by Armyan Bernstein, Dan Gordon based on "The Sixteeth Round" by
Ruben Carter Based upon "Lazarus and The Hurricane" by Sam Chaiton.
Produced by Armyan Bernstein, John Ketcham, norman Jewison at
Universal/Beacon (C)2000. Rated R.
Grade..........................B+
--
Copyright Š 2000. Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Michael Dequina
_The_Hurricane_ (R) *** 1/2 (out of ****)
        The title of _The_Hurricane_ is not only the nickname of its
main character, boxer Rubin Carter, but also an apt description of the
work of Carter's portrayer, Denzel Washington.  Forceful, dynamic, and
wholly natural, Washington's performance ranks among the very best of
his illustrious career--a turn so strong that it easily smooths over
the rough patches in Norman Jewison's fact-based drama.
        And there a few rough patches, especially in the early stages
of the film.  We get to know Carter by way of one Lesra Martin
(Vicellous Reon Shannon), a young American in Canada, as he reads
Carter's autobiography, _The_Sixteenth_Round_.  The book details
Carter's rise up the middleweight ranks through the moment where it
was cut short in 1966, when he and another man were wrongly convicted
of the fatal shootings of three people.  Racism played a major part in
the conviction, in particular that of one detective (Dan Hedaya) who
had been out to nail Carter since his days as a criminally-inclined
youth.  The events as depicted in the film have some basis in fact,
but the portrayal of this detective doesn't quite ring true, for he is
made into such a simplistically shady character that he appears to
have wandered in from an old silent melodrama (all he's missing is a
twirly moustache).  Similarly over-the-top initially is Shannon's
portrayal of Lesra, who originally hails from a rough American
neighborhood; Shannon lays on Lesra's straight-from-the-ghetto
mannerisms a bit too thick at the start to adequately engage one's
sympathies.
        That changes once the meat of _The_Hurricane_'s story kicks
into gear.  Lesra is so deeply inspired by Carter's book that he
begins a correspondence with the inmate, and Lesra convinces his
Canadian guardians (played by Deborah Kara Unger, John Hannah, and
Liev Schreiber) to help in a campaign to clear Carter's name and free
him from prison.  While the efforts to free The Hurricane is a major
issue in the film, of even greater importance is the relationship
between Carter and Lesra.  Once paired with Washington, Shannon's
awkwardness disappears, and the two successfully make their
characters' friendship into a most involving and touching heart for
the film.
        That is but one example of how greatly Washington elevates
_The_Hurricane_.  Although the film gets off to an imperfect start,
his charisma and rapport with the audience instantly commands the
audience's attention and emotional investment.  When the campaign to
overturn Carter's conviction takes precedence (and as such do the
three Canadians) the film threatens to become one of those "white
people save the black man" films, but Washington's intense presence
prevents that from happening.  While the Canadians do the legwork, one
never forgets that it is Carter who is in charge of his own destiny.
        It's easy to compliment Washington's performance strictly on
the basis of its force and focus (and how could one not, when his
commitment to the role is physically manifested by his sculpted
boxer's physique?), but what makes his work especially memorable are
his more subdued moments.  In addition to the warm scenes with Lesra,
particularly noteworthy are the couple of scenes where Carter's
internal struggles are spelled out by having Carter being torn between
two other Carters--an angry one and a weak one.  The device is a
variation of the time-worn gimmick of having and an angel on one
shoulder and a devil on another, but it is completely effective, for
Washington is able to convincingly convey all facets of Carter's
personality--a feat he also manages when just playing the singular
Carter.
        Washington's deft handling of the tri-Carter device is
analagous to the relationship between the actor and all of
_The_Hurricane_: while the whole undertaking is of a conventional
mold, Washington is able to make it into something more.  Granted,
Jewison, with the aid of screenwriters Armyan Bernstein and Dan
Gordon, do put enough pressure on the right emotional buttons
themselves, and Carter's true story is indeed one gripping and
inspiring enough that the film could have very well worked without
Washington.  However, one cannot imagine it working nearly as well
with someone else in the lead.  _The_Hurricane_ is not a piece of
cinematic greatness, but on Washington's mighty shoulders, it often
flirts with becoming one.
Michael Dequina
twotrey@juno.com | michael_jordan@geocities.com |
jordan_host@sportsmail.com | mrbrown@iname.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site:  http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CinemaReview Magazine:  http://www.CinemaReview.com
on ICQ: #25289934  |  on AOL Instant Messenger: MrBrown23

Author
Bob Bloom
The Hurricane (1999) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Denzel Washington, Dan
Hayeda and Vicellas Reon Shannon. Directed by Norman Jewison.
 Norman Jewison's "The Hurricane" is like a powerful force of nature,
unbridled and undisciplined.
 This true story of boxer Rubin `Hurricane' Carter features an intense
performance by Denzel Washington, which should garner him an Academy
Award best actor nomination.
 But Jewison's staging of the film is akin an undisciplined young boxer.
He's a flailer instead of a fighter, always looking for the knock-out
punch and forgetting to jab and feint.
 It is Washington's bridled and disciplined portrayal of Carter that
carries this movie. Playing a man who turns his rage and disappointment
inward, he refuses to be beaten by the system.
 Inside he may suffer, but outwardly he remains proud and defiant. He
refuses to wear a prison uniform saying that he `won't wear the clothes
of a guilty man.' His body may be incarcerated by the state, but his
mind and soul remain free.
 For the uninitiated Carter was a championship boxer who in 1966 was
railroaded to prison for the murder of two men and a woman at a bar in
Paterson, N.J.
 He served more than 20 years before his conviction was overturned by a
federal judge and he was released..
 To simplify the plot - and the film - Jewison has created a villain, a
racist detective played by Dan Hayeda who seems to have had it out for
Carter since he was a kid.
 Unfortunately, this weakens the movie by allowing society and the
prevailing judicial system of that era off the hook and transforming the
racism Carter faced into a personal one-on-one vendetta.
 And director Jewison shows no subtlety in his depiction of Hayeda's
Detective Della Pesca. His racism, his hatred is so apparent, so
overblown that he nearly becomes a cartoonish caricature.
 Yet by force of his acting skill Washington transcends the script's and
Jewison's flaws. The movie crackles when he is on screen,
 "The Hurricane" is two stories. The second concerns a disenfranchised
black youth who lives with a group of three white Canadians in Toronto.
The teen-ager, Lesra Martin (Vicellous Reon Shannon). finds a copy of
Carter's autobiography at a book sale, buys it, reads it and is inspired
by it.
 He writes Carter and a friendship develops. He helps the bitter boxer
by offering hope as he enlists his three activist guardians to help
battle for Carter's freedom.
 The script takes liberties with the facts in the case, trimming the
number of people who fought for Carter's release. Yet it still remains a
powerful document,
 Young Shannon gives a fine performance as the idealistic,
hero-worshipping Lesra, who with the help of his guardians has raised
himself from his street-ghetto environment.
 But this is Washington's movie from start to finish. He doesn't just
play Rubin Carter, he becomes him in walk and talk. It is the actor's
strongest performance to date in a stellar career that already has
included some outstanding work - "Glory," "Philadelphia" and "A
Soldier's Story," to name a few.
 "The Hurricane" has its shortcomings, but the performances and subject
matter compensate for its inadequacies.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Author
Nick Lyons
  "The Hurricane" is hands down the most powerful film of 1999. Although it has
a few minor flaws, one can't help hide it's uplifting message, not to mention a
breakthrough for both Denzel Washington and director Norman Jewison.
  As you may or may not know, the film follows the life of the famous boxer
Rubin "Hurricane" Carter, Hurricane being his nickname. The film starts out
with a murder that was pinned on Rubin, but only we know that he's been
wrongfully accused. The story then focuses on a young boy named Lesra
(Vicellous Reon Shannon), who is struggling in life as well, until he reads the
autobiography of Rubin Carter, which gives him a little inspiration. So the
background story of Rubin basically unfolds as Lesra reads the novel. After he
finishes the book, he is determined to help Rubin out by any means, and he does
with a little help from his friends (Liev Schriber, Deborah Kara Unger and John
Hannah). This leads us to the 2nd part of the film, in which all 4 people
investigate the crime, so that they can give Rubin Carter a fair trial.
  I'll admit, I thought the trailer was a bit sappy, but I must have came into
the movie with an open heart, because I was blown away by it's emotional
impact. Sure it was formulaic and had a simple premise, but there was far more
to it then. A story is only a small portion of the film. The film's messages
are what really worked here, not to mention Denzel Washington's performance,
which I will get into later. The film mainly deals with the racism (in the
first half of the film) towards black men and woman during the 60's, and how
they were treated improperly, while the second half dealt with the inner
struggle to survive with love and hate by your side. It may not seem like much
in words, but is far more descriptive on screen. Absolutely uplifting.
  Unfortunately there are a few flaws. The whole investigation in the film
seemed to have brought it down a notch. I would have rather seen more of
Washington or something with meaning rather than these empty scenes. It just
didn't quite fit. Also as I said before, it is a typical Hollywood film with a
formulaic story. If it was not for that, it would have easily been an excellent
film, but it falls slightly below that. 
  Now for the real knockout in the film, Denzel Washington. Not only is this
his greatest performance, but it's also the best of 99. If someone else was in
his position, I doubt it would have been as believable, nor as powerful. He
delivered here big time. He's got an Oscar Nomination in the bag, maybe even a
win as well. Everyone else in the film did a good job as well.
  Director Norman Jewison has a hit on his hands for once. I have never really
been impressed with his work (with the exception of Moonstruck) up until now.
He has outdone himself and it's about time he's put his good direction skills
to work.
  I suggest you go see "The Hurricane" ASAP, because quite frankly next to "The
Green Mile" and "Toy Story 2" it's one of the best films playing in theaters
now. A must see.

Author
Matt Petras
Cast: Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Deborah Unger, Leiv
Schreiber, John Hannah and Dan Hedaya
Director: Norman Jewison
Producer(s): Armyan Berstein, Norman Jewison, and John Ketcham
        As an up and coming boxer, Rubin 'Hurricane' Carter, had a lot
of things going for him and it looked like things in his life were on
the up and up until he was wrongfully imprisoned for murder. Ending up
spending many years in jail, trying in vain to get his sentence and
wrongful conviction overturned. This movie is the story of his life.
The movie is based on a true story about a real man and is quite
touching and surprisingly doesn't deviate from the truth other than
for some artistic leeway (a Hollywood first). 
        There is some great acting in this movie especially on the
part of Denzel Washington, he manages to capture the role of Rubin
Carter perfectly and makes the movie magical. He manages to portray
the real person as well as the character that is in the script he is
given admirably. Aside from Denzel Washington the remainder of the
cast portray their roles very well and bring out the warm characters
that are involved in this story as well as some of the truly harsh and
evil ones.  The casting for the roles in this movie is great everyone
fit their role perfectly; the movie is an example of what casting for
a movie should be like. The whole cast gives the movie a very real
quality that it needed to have in order to be credible.  
        Now, this movie is quite long being just under three hours so
that's my warning to anyone who can't sit for that long. Regardless of
length the pacing in the movie keeps you interested the whole time
(and we'll ignore the one guy who was happily sleeping when the movie
ended). The pace was perfect I didn't want to get up to stretch my
legs even and that is rare for a movie this long. 
        I like the portrayal of both the jail and the racially tense
atmosphere that is brought out during the course of the movie. The
racial atmosphere changes as time progresses and this is true with
reality, things became more tolerant as time passed with pockets of
hate still existing. This is nothing new and it exists in reality,
this was a good feature to make visible as it gave the movie a grander
more realistic feel to it.  I also like how the jail cell that Ruben
Carter was kept in changed along with the conditions of the jail. Time
doesn't stand still for anyone and things change over time as this the
case in reality the jail changed and the conditions that the inmates
were kept in changed. This attention to detail gives the movie a
certain quality that is often lacking in movies today.
All in all, The Hurricane is a whirlwind ride of a movie that takes us
through the life of a man that was horribly wronged by the system. I
highly recommend it, its informative and thoughtful as well as very
well done and a pleasure to watch. The movie also points out the
importance of being literate. Its definitely one of the best of the
year, well last year now, and I think that it should get some of the
credit it deserves. Good Luck at the Oscars!
February 13, 2000
For any comments I can be reached at bootsector@hotmail.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten
 Universal Studios/Beacon Pictures
 Director: Norman Jewison
 Writer: Armyan Bernstein, Christopher Cleveland
 Cast: John Hannah, Dan Hedaya, David Paymer, Liev
Schreiber, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Rod Steiger, Deborah
Kara Unger, Denzel Washington
   Coincidentally, Univeral has released two movies at the
same time dealing with the theme of injustice toward
members of minority groups.  One is "Snow Falling on
Cedars," in which a Japanese-American is on trial for the
murder of a white man.  The other is "The Hurricane," in
which an African-American is found guilty of murder and
incarcerated for nineteen years.  To plagiarize a paragraph
from my own "Cedars" review....When O.J. Simpson was
found not guilty of murdering his ex-wife and her friend, critics
of the jury system and of lawyers' tactics were quick to
pounce on the verdict.  Given the racial makeup of the jury
and the defense team's alleged playing of the race card,
cynics and detractors in general were quick to say that the
decision was based not on the evidence but on the
willingness of minority jurors to free an African-American
simply because of his race.  What we all know, though, is
that the situation has almost always been the reverse: jurors
have been prone to find innocent people guilty if the
defendants were members of minority groups. 
   Rubin "Hurricane" Carter is a perfect example of a man
convicted by a jury that was swayed by a prosecution team
suffused with racial prejudice.  That point is made
convincingly enough in the film's most cynically humorous
line.  When two patrolmen pull over a car carrying the title
character (Denzel Washington) on his way home, one
remarks, "We're looking for two Negroes in a white car."
Responds Carter, "Any two will do?"  Norman Jewison's
biopic is a dramatization of a major segment of the life of a
Paterson, New Jersey prizefighter who had defeated Emile
Griffith in 1963 to become the welterweight champion of the
world.  
   Like many who take up boxing as a way to enter the
middle class, Carter came from a back of poverty and was in
trouble with the police since he had stabbed a prominent
white man in self-defense.  From the time he was arrested
and sent to a juvenile home, he was pursued by a modern
Javert, Police Lieutenant Della Pesce--described as a bulldog
with glasses (Dan Hedaya)--determined to frame Carter for a
triple murder he did not commit.  
   The film is as high-minded as similar works like "Chariots
of Fire" and, like the football film "Any Given Sunday" which
was released just days before its opening, gives the audience
a taste of the legalized violence which is part and parcel of
contact sports.  Unfortunately, although director Norman
Jewison utilizes the usual tricks of the trade such as frequent
flashbacks, the story is told in a conventional manner more
suited to HBO television than to the big screen.  Featuring an
impressive performance by the always reliable Denzel
Washington (who lost 40 pounds for the role), "The
Hurricane" is a feel-good movie with a razzle-dazzle ending
that could conceivable bring an audience to its feet at the
conclusion.  But Jewison brings little imagination to his
dramatization, turning the story into a disappointingly straight
bad cop-good victim yarn.
    Jewison splits his camera into two segments: one deals
with the struggle that The Hurricane undergoes to transcend
his boyhood days as a victim of a racially biased judicial
system that sent him away and motivated him to turn his
body into a weapon.  The other focuses on a Brooklyn-raised
teen, Lesa Martin (Vicellous Shannon) whom the local school
system was unable to reach and who is now living in Toronto
with three unusual white people who had observed his
intelligence and are tutoring him--Lisa (Deborah Kara Unger),
Sam (Liev Schreiber) and Terry (the British actor, John
Hannah).  Finding Carter's memoirs, "The 16th Round," at a
library sale, Lesra is inspired and becomes bent on
communicating with the prisoner and doing what he can to
get the man freed.
   Norman Jewison comes prepared for a movie like this one,
having directed "In the Heat of the Night" in 1967, a crime
thriller with racial overtones.  That story of a redneck
southern sheriff who accepts the help of a black detective to
solve a murder seems tougher, more atmospheric, with more
cinematic effects that his current offering.  Though Carter
was not exonerated for the crime but rather freed because 
a federal judge (Rod Steiger) found the case tainted by
racial bigotry, Jewsion makes the man a saint.  The picture
is all too solemn, the somewhat fictionalized epistolary
exchange  between Carter and the unconvincing Lesra
dragging the tale down to terminal solmenity.
Rated R.  Running Time: 125 minutes.  (C) 1999
Harvey Karten, film_critic@compuserve.com

Author
Edwin Jahiel
THE HURRICANE (1999) *** Directed by Norman Jewison; written by 
Armyan Bernstein and Dan Gordon, based on "The 16th Round" (1974) 
autobiography by Hurricane Carter, and on "Lazarus and the Hurricane" 
(1991) by Sam Chaiton and Terry Swinton. Photography, Roger Philip 
Rosenberg. Music, Christopher Young. Produced by Bernstein, John 
Ketcham and Jewison. Cast: Denzel Washington (Rubin Carter), John 
Hannah (Terry), Deborah Kara Unger (Lisa), Liev Schreiber (Sam), 
Vicellous Reon Shannon (Lesra), David Paymer (Myron Beldock), Dan 
Hedaya (Della Pesca), Harris Yulin (Leon Friedman), Garland Whitt 
(John Artis), Rod Steiger (Federal Judge Sarokin). A Universal 
release. 146 minutes. R (physical and psychological violence)
Several sources list this movie as 125 minutes long. The theater I 
saw it in says  146, as does the site of its chain. I had intended to 
use my chronometer, but I was engrossed enough to forget doing this.
I am also somewhat baffled by the hullabaloo raised by "The 
Hurricane," about historical inexactitudes and omissions.  The movie 
falls in the genre of biopics. There's no more fanciful type than 
this, barring total fantasies like Hercules fighting the Incas. 
Biopics are notoriously manipulated, falsified, misleading and wrong. 
Think of films from great  (even prize-winning) to junky, about 
figures ranging from Attila to Zola   Napoleon, Zapata, Pasteur, 
Hitler, Lawrence of Arabia, Lord Nelson, Ferdinand de Lesseps, Queen 
Victoria, Buffalo Bill, Juarez, Mata Hari, Al Capone, Bonnie and 
Clyde, Hemingway and so on...
In fact, even with the best, most scholarly and historical 
intentions, the most faithful stories of a life have to have cuts, 
simplifications, amalgamations or condensations when they are turned 
into films.
The fact remains that the story of boxer Rubin "Hurricane" Carter has 
been made into a very good, very moving, very well-acted, very 
well-produced movie. It follows the life of a black boy who is sent 
to reformatory for pulling a knife on a white, influential local who 
is a child molester. The kid spends years in that prison, eventually 
escapes, joins the Army, becomes its lightweight champion abroad, 
returns home, becomes a middleweight contender. Two men enter a New 
Jersey bar and gun down three people (white). Carter, then 29 is 
arrested along with his 21-year old admirer John Artis (black). They 
are falsely accused and sentenced to three consecutive life 
sentences. They spent 19 years in prison.
Claiming his innocence, Carter set to prove it from his cell. As 
played by the extraordinary Denzel Washington, he is a mixture of 
fascinating personalities that complement one another: the rebel, the 
good convict, the man in despair, the man who educates himself, the 
writer of his autobiography "The 16th Round" published in 1974 while 
he was still in jail. It is this book that comes to the attention of 
Lesra, a 15-year old African-American boy whom some Canadian 
activists and commune-dwellers in Toronto had rescued from a bad 
family environment and "adopted" so as to prepare him for high school.
Lesra's fascination for Rubin Carter communicates to his hosts. These 
are Sam, Terry and Lisa, the prettiest chain-smoker in film history. 
They dedicate themselves to proving Rubin innocent, and eventually 
succeed.
The film has superior photography, and acting by Washington and by 
Vicellous Reon Shannon (Lesra) who is already an experienced actor 
and who is in reality far older than what he seems to be. The choice 
of music is one of the best, including the song "Hurricane" by Bob 
Dylan. Dylan was one of the defenders of Rubin's, along with many 
other champions, celebrities and non-celebrities, but it would seem 
that it was only the Canadian friends who showed enough staying power 
to finish the job.
"The Hurricane" is a grab-your-heartstrings, moving motion picture, 
even a two-handkerchief work. Its director, Norman Jewison, is a 
Canadian and an old "liberal" (a nice word that has been made into a 
pox by the Right). His credits include themes of discrimination, "A 
Soldier's Story" (about a black army officer) and "In the Heat of the 
Night"(about a  black Philadelphia policeman in the South). He knows 
his subject.
"The Hurricane" is not without some inventions (over and above the 
omissions), such as a vengeful cop who is Rubin's nemesis the way 
Inspector Javert was to Jean Valjean in "Les Miserables." I will not 
detail them. They are for a good cause. They are also counterbalanced 
by some discreet touches, e.g. a prison guard who likes  Carter, 
probably believes him, yet shows it silently simply through 
photographic angles and close-ups.
I disregard, or at least don't get hot under the collar for,  several 
of the objections to the movie's historicity. But one aspect annoyed 
me: the fact that the three Canadians were unexplored characters. In 
reality there were several more people in the commune, here reduced 
to just three, the pro-Rubin activists. But eliminating the others 
leads to confusion. Are Terry, Lisa and Sam a menage a trois? Can one 
call three cohabitants a commune? What exactly did the micro-commune 
do besides taking in Lesra and fighting for Rubin?  (We are not told, 
either, that eventually Lisa and Rubin married, then divorced --but 
that could be justified as a personal fact that comes after Carter's 
liberation).
Lacunae, some distortions and all, the film is valid, involving and 
anti-racist.. Its flaws of omission and commission are characteristic 
of the arguments of true believers in causes, of  political 
movements, of schools of thought, where the activists draw blanket 
conclusions. Imperfect, but a fact of life.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Author
Lars Lindahl
Starring Denzel Washington, John Hannah, Live Schreiber, Deborah Kara Unger,
Viscellous Reon Shannon, Dan Hedaya, Harris Yulin, David Paymer, Clancy Brown,
and Rod Steiger.
Directed by Norman Jewison
Written by Armayan Bernstein and Dan Gordon
Denzel Washington is among the many actors this holiday season to give very
impressive milestone performances. This perhaps may be Washington's very best
to date. He joins Matt Damon and Jim Carrey in having the talent, this season,
to become his character, copying mannerisms and personal styles perfectly. His
very believable performance makes the long and uninteresting "The Hurricane" a
much better film than it actually is. When his Rubin "Hurricane" Carter feels
pain and is tormented by racism, he creates for the audience a great sense of
sympathy, disgust, and maybe even some embarrassment from the fact that this is
our very own country that is breaking laws to support silly prejudices. The
horrific true events Carter suffered from all of his life are slightly more
disturbing and terrifying because they only took place a few decades ago. The
powerful expressions of Denzel Washington alone, as his tortured Carter, sum up
the troubles of racism in America's history. He is that amazing. The problem
with "The Hurricane" is that when compared to Washington, all of the other
actors are not nearly as memorable in their roles. Mainly because the script
focuses so much on Carter, that it leaves little interest or room for the other
actors. This is, without a doubt, Washington's movie but in order for any film
to be completely satisfying, it must utilize everyone in the cast to their
highest potential not just the stars.  
Denzel Washington is the only reason to see this film for his inspirational and
very depressing tour de force performance. As Rubin Carter, we see a black man
whose existence has been a punching bag for the white American court system.
>From the age of eleven to twenty one he was sent to a juvenile prison for a
crime he did not commit. Then after a successful marriage and boxing career, he
was harshly imprisoned again for life after being framed for a triple murder.
Carter's second term in prison seemed almost inevitable when faced off against
jealous, powerful white men who refused to let him succeed. From these past
experiences in jail, Carter realized that he must make his case heard for all
of America. After several court appeals, an autobiography, and many public
marches for his freedom, Carter remained locked in prison. It was not until a
young black boy from Brooklyn being educated in Toronto read Carter's book in
the 1980's, that a serious battle for freedom took place. The young boy and his
three Canadian guardians decide to dedicate all of their time to the case until
Carter is released. 
The greatest scenes in the film are when Carter begins to lose his mind after
spending three months in isolation. Washington really shows the breakdown of
Carter when after swearing he would never go to jail again, he is unfairly
framed at the height of his innocent career. The devastation in Washington's
eyes show a man who has struggled to do the right thing his whole life only to
be punished for it. In the hole, Carter attempts to maintain emotional balance
but he cannot. His anger is heightened to a point of no control. We see
multiple Carters, a violent angry one, a silent passive one, and a mediator. We
see an emotional boxing match inside Carter's head. From this point in the hole
to the end of the film, this fight continues. It is very apparent at times
which side is winning the battle and in some scenes there is a direct switch
from angry to caring or the opposite. When Carter sees that white Canadians
want to help him get out of prison, the angry Carter at first erupts. White
people have been trying to hurt him his whole life, this reminder leads to
anger in his head. However, as the film continues and the Canadians continue to
help Carter we see the calm side him. He realizes that society is changing.
That racism is decreasing and now Carter wants to leave jail immediately and
become a part of this world. Very rarely have I seen such determination to
perfect his role as Washington has done here. If only the other actors had this
same determination.
Dan Hedaya, ridiculously plays the man who sends Carter to prison twice by
forcing witnesses to lie and switching evidence around. It felt like his
character was taken straight out of a "Scooby Doo" episode; he would have
gotten away with it if it wasn't for those annoying little kids. "The kids" in
this film are the three Canadians who are terribly underused making their
relationship with Carter underdeveloped and unbelievable. The lawyers who help
release Carter also are underused, as is Clancy Brown as a kind prison guard
(the complete opposite of his character in "Shawshank Redemption"). There is a
great amount of talent in this supporting cast but it just never appears.
Hedaya was superb in "Clueless," same for David Paymer in "Get Shorty," Harris
Yulin in "Ghostbusters" and Liev Schreiber in "The Daytrippers." It is a
mystery how this many actors signed on to such shallow roles. On the other
hand, it is absolutely no mystery why Denzel Washington agreed to play Rubin
"Hurricane" Carter. This role is about as far off from shallow as you can get.

Author
Shay Casey
Year: 1999.
Starring Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Deborah Unger, Liev
Schreiber, John Hannah, Dan Hedaya, Debbi Morgan, Clancy Brown, David
Paymer, Harris Yulin, Rod Steiger.
Screenplay by Armyan Bernstein and Dan Gordon.
Directed by Norman Jewison.
Rated R.
There are times when the success of a particular film depends entirely on
one actor's effort. Often a single performance can turn what might have been
a rather mediocre movie into something worthwhile. When one of these comes
along, I usually try to think about how many other people put work into the
movie, that there is no way one person could possible carry the entire
project on his shoulders. But sometimes there is simply no other
explanation, and such is the case with "The Hurricane." This biopic about
falsely convicted boxer Rubin "Hurricane" Carter would normally be called
"Norman Jewison's 'The Hurricane,'" as per the tradition of referring to a
film "belonging" to a director. But though he does decent work, Jewison
cannot claim ownership of "The Hurricane," because there is one reason this
film works at all, and his name is Denzel Washington.
Washington plays Carter, a boxer who in 1967 was convicted of a late-night
shooting in a bar. Jailed for 20 years, he maintained that he had never
committed the crimes, but remained in jail after a second trial and
countless appeals. The situation changed when a group of Canadians moved to
Washington and worked on freeing Carter. Through the efforts of that group
and Carter's lawyers, he was eventually freed when their case was heard in
federal court and the judge ruled that Rubin Carter had been unfairly
convicted. The film details Carter's childhood, which had him in and out of
jail because of the efforts of a racist cop (Dan Hedaya). When he finally
got out of prison for good, Carter became a rising star as a middleweight
pro boxer, seemingly having his career on track, until the police framed him
for multiple homicide. Despite the efforts of political activists and
celebrities, he remained imprisoned. Flash forward to 1983, when Lesra
(Vicellous Reon Shannon) a young African-American boy, living with a group
of Canadian tutors, reads the book Carter wrote while in prison. The book,
entitled "The Sixteenth Round," opens young Lesra's eyes to the injustice
that was Carter's life, and he vows to help free the incarcerated boxer.
Lesra convinces his Canadian friends (Deborah Unger, Liev Schreiber, John
Hannah) to work with him towards his goal.
"The Hurricane" leans on Denzel Washington. He must carry virtually every
scene by sheer force of will, and he does so brilliantly. It's probably
accurate to say that Washington does not embody Rubin Carter, because he
plays a character far stronger and nobler than any real person could hope to
be. It would perhaps be more accurate to say that Washington embodies the
character of Rubin Carter--a fictional personality invented solely for the
film. The actor's work is masterful; Washington throws himself into every
moment, refusing to keep the audience at arm's length. We feel everything he
feels: the humiliation of having to return to prison after fighting so hard
to make something of his life, the pain of having to order his wife to give
up the fight, and the utter despair he feels when coming to the conclusion
that all hope is lost. Washington's is a performance of weight and emotional
depth. He doesn't merely play angry, happy, or sad; he feels it at the
deepest level. His work is masterful, and for half of this film I realized
that the scene I was watching would not have been nearly as affecting as it
was if it had been in the hands of another actor.
Norman Jewison directs the film, doing a reasonably good job of pacing and
shot selection. "The Hurricane" moves quickly, with no scene drawn out much
further than necessary and the narrative galloping along nicely. Jewison
handles his multiple flashbacks well; the audience is always aware of just
what the time and place of each scene is, and nothing is terribly confusing.
His boxing scenes, constructed with clear inspiration from "Raging Bull,"
get inside the action very well, and they are believable as real sports
footage. Jewison puts together a particularly nice scene by utilizing a
pretty cool trick: Carter is sent to solitary confinement for 90 days when
he refuses to wear a prison uniform, and Jewison, assisted by some wonderful
acting from a game Washington, shows how Carter gradually starts to lose his
mind during the constant solitude, and eventually we get three Rubin Carters
arguing with each other in one cell. Jewison's best achievement in "The
Hurricane" is succeeding at showing how Carter becomes an embittered man
during his hard-knock life, and how he is able to break out of that
bitterness and learn to trust people again.
Sadly, though, the film's chief failures lie with the screenplay, as with
most of the good-but-not-great efforts to round the pike this winter. There
is much to interest a viewer in "The Hurricane," but it seems that every
time the film gets a chance to take the most clichéd route possible, it
does. Take a look at the supporting characters, for example, who are drawn
up as either entirely good or entirely evil. Carter and Lesra (played nicely
by Shannon, who deserves credit) are the only real people here; everyone
else is a stereotype. The Canadians are good. The cops are bad. The
Canadians spend most of their time dolefully grinning at each other in their
lovey-dovey commune (and it is a commune, despite the film's failure to make
that clear), while every racist cop (especially Dan Hedaya's) melts in out
of the shadows and glowers at every black person that enters the room. Much
of the dialogue comes off as rather hokey ("Hate put me in prison. Love's
gonna bust me out."), and the big courtroom climax during which everyone
gets to make an impassioned speech could have been lifted from a made-for-TV
Lifetime special. It's too bad. The cast is game, the director does his job,
and the subject matter is interesting, but the script takes the safer,
slightly more boring route far too often. I wanted a real reason for the cop
to hold a grudge against Carter other than "he's a racist pig." I wanted
more evidence that these Canadians are real people with faults and virtues
instead of a bunch of saintly crusaders looking for justice. In short, I
wanted to see the film through a less distorted lens.
Criticism has been levied against the liberties "The Hurricane" takes with
the truth of what really happened to Carter, and much of it is deserved. For
example, the film gives us a boxing scene showing Carter pummeling defending
champ Joey Giardello, only to be screwed by the judges, who ruled Giardello
the winner. Most accounts of the fight, however, have Carter losing fairly.
Furthermore, much of Carter's criminal past is conveniently left out of the
film, and just why he was convicted again in his second trial is never
really explained. Of course, "The Hurricane" works mainly as a fable, so
digressions from the truth can be excused at least partially, but even
dismissing such issues don't remove one fact: "The Hurricane" is a highly
flawed film. Only one actor could have made a schmaltzy, predictable picture
like this work as well as it does, and it's a good thing "The Hurricane" has
that actor. Carter has been quoted as saying, "Denzel Washington is making
me look good," but he's not the only one. Washington makes this film look
good. Denzel Washington's "The Hurricane." Sounds pretty good to me.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html
